He is. Also, his music sucks major ass.   There are lots of mindless worshippers on reddit. You wouldn't be able to stay sane here without denying their existence.  The biggest and most relevant outburst against the now-apparent absurdity of Grammys came from Ricky Gervais. Reznor probably figured out it is getting popular in circle-jerk communities to bash Grammys, and voila!  He is like a musical version of Carlos Mencia. He creates unintelligible sounds, he loves to grab attention, and he pretends he is remotely relevant.  Nice to get that out of my chest. Keep on.
Well, certainly the most similar thing I've done: a few weeks after I married my wife, I arrived back at our apartment to discover my wedding ring had slipped off my finger. I retraced my steps about a mile and a half and found it in the middle of a major street I had crossed on my way home.
[Here](http://imgur.com/HWaM2.jpg)  I use my own pictures as backgrounds; this is Venice. 
Even with the new link, it doesn't make any goddamn sense why you titled it "bitches in pain".
Totally on the same page with you.  Was thinking this just yesterday, in fact.  
The strange thing about my relationship is that I think we have the same views, but I watch the news in general, where she just refuses to watch Fox News and rarely catches any of the news, then fabricates her own reality based on her fringe absorption of the news.  So when I try to have conversations with her about such things, her opinions are two months old and only tangentially related to the point I was trying to talk about.  Then, later, I realize I didn't really have all the information about what I was talking about and the real crux of the problem is that the issue has little actual proof, so much of our opinions are fringe theories and conspiratorial notions.  tl;dr ... I'm starting to think that things are purposefully obfuscated to the point of nobody being able to talk about them logically at all.
WHAT. Are you serious? CSS is mainly a new engine with slightly revamped maps, new models and textures... and that's pretty much it. The gameplay is the same, the weapons are the same, the strategies are the same. TF2 is a *completely* different game from TFC with some very fundamental gameplay differences.
Also see the white nationalist justification for attacks on Jews, by appealing to treatment of Palestinians (mentioned in another post here).  There is no systematic enmity between white people and brown people; this is simply a convenient myth. There are only many groups (white, brown, black, and multicolor) each seeking their own interests.
classic
Definitely the best place on the web to get your E-liquid marlboro refill juice for your Electronic Cigarette. Orders ship from the USA and typically arrive within 3 days max. I was very pleased with the other flavors as well. 
I dunno ... I like my gibs with a little more marbling.
Well, the headline really doesn't bullshit ya.
i think is break, neutral, turn car off  http://www.popularmechanics.com/automotive/how_to/4344079.html
I have the keen ability to key into people's malicious intentions before they even know they have them.  This could just be a clever suggestion to get individuals like me to switch to avast and open ourselves up to millions of viruses and trojans.  Some people tell me I'm paranoid, but I think they're just secretly out to get me.  Deceptively yours,  Signs his posts
Would you like to expand on that at all?
Get a hair cut
We need fewer of you and more of the other guy.
[The sign next to it--which has a sketch of what it was supposed to look like](http://imgur.com/YO873.jpg)
The resort I worked in was in Land O Lakes FL where there are about 10 nudist resorts/hangouts.  I left to move to Argentina with my boyfriend = )
I see you, though.
This to me is the best as well. It doesn't hog up computer resources as much as other antiviruses.
I'd be so afraid of it over heating unless it has an opening on the bottom and back for the vents.
i got an original iMac for $2.99 at a thrift shop.  it was labeled "monitor" so i don't think they realized it was complete system.  only thing wrong with it was a broken cd drive.  not bad.
you have an update for avast! they got a new icon and it's more shiny now
I have a better solution. I download everything to my desktop, and then turn off desktop items so it's not cluttered. Essentially my Desktop folder could just be rename downloads...
They tend to be really pontificatious (I made that word up just now) and "holier than thou", yes.  They also tend to be complete snobs about most movies or books, but have no problem fawning over the latest fad or big-traffic item, which is a major issue.  I follow their feed, but only look at certain items - I don't typically read any of their reviews or editorial type stuff.  I just use them for nerd/scifi news that I might have an otherwise hard time finding, unless they do something like an interview with someone I'm interested in.
DLL files on the desktop .... n00b
someone else in a similar situation has done one already, but if my redorange envelope keeps popping up i might do another.  :http://www.reddit.com/r/ILiveIn/comments/ak0zi/i_live_in_a_29_sailboat_ama/
Awesome. Thank you.
Im confident that it is a USO disguised as a rock
this incident sums up the "war on terror" for me.
$400? I don't know what rock you're living under.
Perhaps. Btw I was thinking the other day and realized I have literally never been to Brooklyn. That's how far it is. (for all other redditors looking at this thread, sorry.)
&gt; In ME1, take a pistol with high heat generation. (Not HE rounds, though). Fire constantly. Even with the latest patch, 9/10 times if I was still firing when it overheated it would not cool down until the game was saved/reloaded. It'd happen with all my weapons, and I found quite a few others experiencing it on the net. My very first impression with the new system was that it was a joke about this bug.  I remember this bug.  I thought you were referring to something in Mass Effect 2, but most of it is actually misconception.  Many people didn't realize that enemies could use Sabotage on you to disable your weapons for a short time.  &gt; Well, I guess I should be glad it's better than gears? I'll agree it's not bad, except when trying to run away. Mouse sensitivity is about 2x what I'd like, so I whip it around like I'm playing ME1 and I end up sprinting INTO the aforementioned Krogan.. Skidding around.. Then attaching myself to this side of the crate I wanted to hide behind.  So tune down the mouse sensitivity.  I was fortunate enough to enjoy the default setting right off the bat.  Again, I found the cover system very intuitive.  &gt; Each of my four playthroughs were on the hardest available (Unlocking two, then a new one on insane). However, I did bump the difficulty down by one on the fresh playthrough after I rescued Liara, as a low level character has extreme difficulty dealing with insane enemies. On the existing character, however, I didn't have much of a problem at all - and the polonium rounds kept the Krogan from REGAINING health with their regen biotic move while I focused the inevitable second one down.  Again, you haven't played Mass Effect on Insanity or Hardcore.  Polonium rounds do nothing to stop Immunity.  You're forced to wait until it runs out for you to start doing any damage.  &gt; Nope, but isn't that the point? There's almost always a best in slot in any rpg, and you certainly don't start the game with it in ME1. I didn't have spectre gear on my first playthrough, and I was like a kid in a candy store on my fourth, where I got into the new types of hybrid weapon mods. They completely changed how my main weapon - pistol -worked, due to using two rail extensions and a snowblind round. - In fact, I started with better gear in ME2 - the DLC ones, nothing to do with my having a existing save, and I've heard people have used the Terminus armor the whole game.  For certain games, sure.  It's a nice carrot on a stick.  For Mass Effect, I'd rather the developers focused time on more important things like designing thousands of generic items you'll never touch again.  So having items that are preferential rather than straight upgrades is better.  It worked in the context of the first Mass Effect when you were gaining Spectre status.  In Mass Effect 2, it simply doesn't make sense.  You are in the process of adjusting to resurrection, but you are still one of the greatest soldiers in galactic history, with billions of dollars poured into your return and the financial backing of the entire Cerberus organization.  So you're going to tell me this organization dropped billions on bringing you back, designing you the most advanced warship in the galaxy and you still have to "work" your way up to better guns?  Breaks the disbelief.  Mass Effect 2 did a lot of things very well, including how many gameplay mechanics make sense with the events of the game.
&gt; Don't know how true it all is but it definitely shows a balanced look at the man.  Waaaaait a second.
LibraryThing.com  Trust me, I am a librarian.  
Is that supposed to be goatse?
Spend it on quality tools and skills.
1.  Agreed, but if the landfills are holding carbon that would otherwise be released into the atmosphere, then they are a good thing.  The fact that they take thousands of years to decompose is exactly why they are such a good storage medium for carbon that would otherwise be released into the atmosphere. 2.  If buried in a landfill, none of it ends up in the ocean. 3.  UV degeneration should not happen without exposure to UV, which cannot happen in a landfill where the trash is not exposed to UV.  But this is a good point.  It still doesn't have any effect on the carbon equation of the bottle.
how?
If that's a serious question, no.  I'm a mut.  I can't say exactly, as there's a bit of a black hole on the history on my Dad's side, but I know that Irish is my highest percentage (I guess it would be measured by percentage).  If that's a reference to something like "The Jersey Shore," well then I'll [fist pump](http://www.guidofistpump.com/wp-content/uploads/2007/12/FistPump-print.jpg) to that!
Maybe he put peanuts in all of your front pant pockets and waited for the perfect moment to make you think he threw one into your pocket!
The level where the hands first pop up in Eversion literally made me jump out of my chair. Plus the first time where the music went "evil" sounding and the blocks got sad faces... I pretty much shat a brick.
I have a lot of friends riding that bike and they love it.  It takes abuse pretty well; just keep your chain oiled and remember tires are cheap. Dirt is always more fun than roads and easier on your tires.
Slightly off topic - there are some good [Australian podcasts](http://www.abc.net.au/services/podcasting/) - try science and health. 
Yeah. Interesting concept and story, but not implemented well.
Irréversible.   No not really. It's the most shocking movie I have ever seen.
Several of the posters to that thread make it clear that they rate a tax cut for themselves as more important than the torture and oppression of others.  I would genuinely like to call myself a libertarian, but this obsession with taxation at the expense of other more serious threats to liberty is what prevents me doing so.
It looks like something from a 1950s spacecraft designer, but it's on sale in Yamaha's Japanese showrooms right now.
Thanks that's good info.  It helps sometimes just to get confirmation that you're on the right track.  Lately I've been treating the secondary as nothing but a clarification or dry hopping step, but it took a while to come to that point.  I was convinced early on that the fermentation needed that second step to complete.  It's amazing how much pseudo-science based advice there is in the online homebrew community.  Guess nothing can substitute for your own experience.  At this point I'm thinking I should have racked last week and given it a week for clarity's sake, could have been bottling today.
That was fun.
Some people get really irrational when they're drunk.  When drinking: My mother would tell us she hated us and would threaten to kill herself. My father would tell me I was a whore just like my mother.  Afterward they wouldn't remember saying these things at all. Your GF probably won't either. So,  show her your iphone recording, make it a prerequisite to staying together that she can't drink that much, because you don't want to deal with her when she gets like that. 
I was gonna stick a question mark on the last sentence ;)
Apparently it's not just No BC HST; but Axe the BC Gas Tax is gone too.  I wonder how many other groups are going to disappear? It would seem that Facebook would have been a great way for organizers to use these groups to contact interested individuals to attend protests during the olympics, and now that avenue is gone.
Last time I checked, being homosexual didn't cause harm against anyone else.
&gt; Since when can you do allocation in an embedded system? Don't you know precisely how much memory you have attached to the system?  Well, I know precisely how much memory is connected to my desktop system as well.  It depends really on how flexible your software needs to be.  A super-basic cheapo cell phone might have 128KB of storage, but it's still nice to allow someone to use as much of that 128KB as desired for storing contacts or for storing call history or whatever else.  You could have static limits just to make things simpler, but a memory allocator is not *that* complex a piece of software.
It takes a lot of practice to acutally be able to have sex while on E. But really foreplay makes E so much fun.....
for some reason first thing that came to mind mind when i saw this pic was kings of leon...
-Alcohol   -Weed   -Chloraform
in a similar fashion, the movie Puppet Master used to fuck me up royally as a kid whenever it was on SciFi
Dissapointing maybe, but not misleading.
so that must be why we're paying $100 per bag of laundry for every US soldier overseas.  The spirit of "free market" saves the day again!
Lets face it, in this day and age a guy who is into fat chicks is like a kid in a candy store 24/7.  He's definitely NOT going to try and find some slender/waify chick and plump her up.  The reverse is the average story 99% of the time.
The creator didn't, however.
if you put an ellipsis between "chose" and "poorly," you'll have yourself an Indiana Jones quotation.
Have you ever smoked crack?
sony piece already mentioned, so older, sillier. ["How are we supposed to understand things like the atom or the nature of gravity if we don't even know what colliding monkeys sound like?"](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/30420)
I reckon you should cross the road to avoid white folks for lols
*/me cues the flood of paranoid honeypot comments*
You're welcome. - Signed, Wal-Mart and McDonald's
My ignorance?  I think it is pretty naive of people to not learn how to protect themselves. My girlfriend and mother have both been raped before, and I take it very seriously. Both of them learned how to protect themselves, and have had to defend themselves in the past.  You think men don't have to be wary and protect themselves? If that is what you think, you are clearly the ignorant one. We learn to protect ourselves at a very young age because we have to - we don't have society doing it for us.  Please step off the high horse for a moment, thanks.
Not drinking.  ;-)
I still want to crawl in a hole, but it makes the hole hella more comfortable and everyone's head is that much safer from my slavering demon-bitch jaws. [5]
maybe there is a site that is like antiques roadshow, but amongst our reddit members you should have your mystery solved. good luck, i am tapped for ideas. 
Any help guides for the 360 version? Cause I can never figure out how to shoot, just mark enemies and then crash. 
Hide Desktop Items :P  It's like hiding everything under the bed
Yeah, that's the type of anecdotal evidence I have to... I was hoping to get a different story from you, bummer.  Thanks for the honesty though.
Just learn HTML in general. CSS and Javscript as well. Just stuff thats actually practical right now.  HTML 5 is backwards compatible, so you shouldnt have a problem moving forward as it does. But the spec isnt finished, probably wont be for a few years knowing past history, and doesnt have much of a user base. So don't shoot yourself in the foot.
Sure. I'm interested in anything you wanna share!
I did pretty much the same thing only I lose a bus full of children I had attached my first pole to and the pole I hooked had hooked the other lost pole and when pulled up each kid had a (39 inch cat)fish in there hands.  Not trying to be the one-up guy.
Ah, yes. The ancient art of Propheteering.
That looks like a series of cheap shots to me... if this weapon has any basis in physical reality, all of those maneuvers should have destroyed it. You can't plow a little helicopter into a person / wall / telephone pole and still have it in working condition. Is it also silent?   I would try it myself, but my beta key was already in use. 
The first movie I remember going to see in a theatre was Disney's Aladdin. I screamed and screamed when the lion cave came out of the sand, it was terrifying.
Start a jogging regimen. If you do it, and stick to it, it will become an addiction. A good addiction that fights depression. You will look better. You will feel better. 
Great list.  Most mushroom cultivation is based on having live spawn grown on sterile media, which is impractical in a total collapse.   There are techniques for growing magic mushrooms using ordinary canning jars and spores from a fresh mushroom, which are reasonably common around cattle.  The Chinese and Japanese cultivated shitakes by stacking fresh logs on one that was already producing.  But shitakes aren't native here, and they need a bit more help.
you need more post it notes
Agreed, though they're usually pretty obvious with a little bit of a critical eye put on them. If someone's been part of a forum, and more than 50% of their posts are talking about a company or short one sentence posts, it's pretty clear they're shills. 
not at all, I remember what my parents went through under Thatcher (My dad went to court for not paying the poll tax), as an adult I experienced John Major and the loss to Blair in '97. I remember day-to-day life in the mid-90's and can compare it to the incredible ridiculous shit we put up with today.   In 13 years Labour have introduced well over 3600 new criminal offences - I don't think anything else needs to be said. I'll repeat what I said in the last post: 'they're all as bad as each other'.
Yes!  Absolutely terrifying.
Are you taking drugs or just naturally paranoid?
[Hawaii Volcanoes National Park](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hawaii_Volcanoes_National_Park). You can walk around on lava fields and pretend you're in Mordor.
A pirate's hat.
"Drive by Wire" usually only refers to throttle control.  The brakes are usually pneumatic (vacuum) assist, a mechanical system.  Steering is usually hydraulically assisted mechanical.  The exception might be the Prius.  I don't know enough about it.
"I don't want to smoke because I don't want to look like a cock magnet"  One of my favorite lines in any Onion video
How old are you? 15?
Why did three people comment to tell me the same thing?! One is obviously enough lol
Do yourself a favor. PARTY DOWN. It's brilliantly casted with actors from the State, Freaks and Geeks and Christopher Guest movies. It's also written by Paul Rudd and directed by Fred Savage. Definitely the best comedy series I've seen in a long time.   http://www.sidereel.com/Party_Down  Premise-  The show follows a Los Angeles catering team, a sextet of aspiring Hollywood wannabe actors, writers and musicians stuck working for tips while hoping for their "big break." Each episode of this half-hour comedy finds the hapless catering team working a new event, and inevitably getting tangled up with the colorful guests and their absurd lives.
Correlation is not the same as causation.  As an example, lets say you want to investigate the ability to speak chinese across the human population from a genetic perspective.  You would find that there are some genes that are highly correlated (like the one that makes chinese eyes different).  That does not equal causation, that people with that gene can automatically speak chinese.
women are manipulative.. oh wait, that's not a stereotype, that's a fact.
&gt;Arsenal were absolutely terrible at the back today.  Agreed. Gallas kept getting (inexcusably) caught in the counter, and Clichy was absolutely worthless. Vermaelen's not bad, but he seems to press too far forward, which catches him out of position too frequently. With the fact that he was the only one who could put the ball on target today, maybe he should just be put at forward, and Wenger should buy a whole new back line.
I had a green Combat rifle that held 150 rounds.  Just held the button and watched all 150 disappear.
[flaming vikings](http://www.boston.com/bigpicture/2010/01/fiery_european_festivals.html)
Eyes Wide Shut, and [this scene](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ADrojCw6amM) in Who Framed Rodger Rabbit...
I don't really see the point of building a system (albeit configuring WP plugins) to notify families of their balance.  Why not set up WP to accept payments; better yet, create a paypal account for them.  Then they can email the balance values to their users.  The people will most likely have email addresses.  No sense in complicating the process.  Unless there's more you didn't tell us.  **Edit**: If you insist I would suggest using [WP Sentry](http://www.peteholiday.com/wp-sentry/)  WP Sentry allows you as the WP admin to create groups of users and allow or deny access to posts to certain groups.  You could, in theory, create a group for each "family" and only allow that "family"/group access to their post.  You could put their balance on that post.  Given then information you provided, that's what I would do.
Andrew Garcia and Cathy Nguyen videos are HHoTT!
Why did three people comment to tell me the same thing?! One is obviously enough lol
I preferred the [previous theory](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/avvsq/set_phasers_to_bacon/) that his brother had.
Sangria. Get a bunch of red wine. Some fresh fruit. Kiwi, orange, apple, mango, what ever you like. just use plenty of fruit and mix it in the wine. Let it marinade  for about twelve hours and then ad lemonade until it tastes right. You can not fuck this up so it is perfect.
I have no hope that the Republicans will ever be reasonable. I see no point in even talking to them.
&gt;They were probably smarter, nicer and more cultured.  You have, however, any proof of that? It'd be cool to check it out. 
3G's on an ultimate commuter bike, I'd never have a reason not to ride. I'd use the rest to get more people out riding.  This is assuming I have not debt or house.
Yes, you require an element of trust when you tell us what the idea is. But it's a calculated risk like anything else.
I wish I could go to sleep at will and always wake up feeling well rested. I can never get any good quality sleep.
The cockroach was THIS BIG  FTFY
There's a lot of (amateur) science going on about this subject [here](http://www.straightdope.com/columns/read/1369/why-does-the-shower-curtain-blow-in-despite-the-water-pushing-it-out-revisited)
I'm cutting a showreel for one of the actors of Animal Kingdom, [Sullivan Stapleton](http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0822982/). Cool guy.  edit: for links, thanks for putting this together!
if that's really vista i demand a guide..
I'm watching all 5 seasons all the way through in preparation for the new season, and I find myself wishing for this at points as well. Mostly when people that I like die.  They said they're definitely not gonna do anything like "it was all a dream" or "it was just aliens messing with them".....but that still leaves open the possibility of them somehow undoing it open.  Based on what the writers have said, I don't think that's gonna happen. They always said the character deaths were important because it emphasizes that there are life or death stakes.
&gt; Besides, GCC focuses on for loop optimizations. This person has written code tailored to avoid such.  It does not. do/while is preferred because its minimum frequency is higher; ie, it will always run at least once rather than at least zero times.  GCC does prefer loops that can be decomposed with scalar evolution analysis, which pretty much just means you shouldn't do if statements based on the value of the iteration variable. Avoiding memory aliasing is also important, but `restrict` doesn't work in gcc 4.0-4.4 so you can't do that anyway.
Dave Mustaine, *former* Megadeth frontman? Sounds like the Onion needs a new fact-checker.
Is [this](http://www.boston.com/bigpicture/2010/01/fiery_european_festivals.html) the ones you are looking for?
There are a few ghetto parts of AA, in the southeastern portion past Buhr park.  It's a tiny neighborhood. I mostly used the title for comparative sake to the other post.  It's not so much black tv-"hood" as it is inner city.
Why did three people comment to tell me the same thing?! One is obviously enough lol
Absolutely one of the best games on SNES and one of the fondest of my youth.  Thank you for the suggestion; my Droid now has one more app on it :).
I think you mean to title it "People Flee Massive Israeli Bombing."
Facebook has been pretty quick to acquiesce to gov't requests to remove advocacy groups in the past.
The body snatchers have come back.
You know, I am not sure, I am sure it helps in some way but I never really get bad PMS and I am stoned all the time. It could be anybodys guess :)
You mean this guy? http://projectumbrella.net/files/images/Nemesis.jpg  That's Resident Evil 3  :)
from my experience everyone i know called Graeme is a homo.
Sometimes it gets the person to respond, often with an addendum or a thank you, leading to more discussion. Mostly it lets the person know they made another laugh. 
Classic douche play.
So that commercial about Dunkin Doughnuts in space wasn't lieing?
RAMIREZ! SWITCH TO YOUR SIDEARM!
People continually try to tell me that not only was there a sequel, there were in fact two (!) sequels to The Matrix. I think I'd remember movies of the same caliber and quality of The Matrix...
That's just brilliant. What makes it so great is just imagining Bush saying all those things. Then, sadly, you realize that you don't have to imagine too hard.
Is this a t-shirt?
I am not mad at women. I am disappointed at the select women who haven't learned coping mechanisms for dealing with this stuff. And I am mad at assholes who behave that way, and I regularly speak up to stop it.
100 mbit in 7 years ain't gonna mean shit.
*That's interesting, Para-Medic, but how do they taste?*
i still dont get the white rain thing.
This makes me smile.
Huh?
God damn Dumbo, those pink elephants still haunt me.
[http://www.boston.com/bigpicture/2010/01/fiery_european_festivals.html](http://www.boston.com/bigpicture/2010/01/fiery_european_festivals.html)
by the time I was on the second line of your post, I had forgotten that you were replying to another post at all. 
If I come on my horde char, will you all kill me?
You could try [Netlib](http://www.returninfinity.com/other.html), a very clean, portable, and well documented C library for networking.
are you sure that's a narwhal???
anyone else REALLY like this topics picture? Look at that icon; that's a great icon!
Simpler solution, just ask Jesus.
I think the same can be said for psychopathic people in general.  All of those centuries, the sexual abuse of kids by priests has been covered up, hushed under a rug because of religion.  And look at honor killings in the world.  And look at those parents who allow their children to die because they believed that getting their children medical attention would doom them to hell.  Any atrocity becomes more acceptable when the person doing it is perceived to be very pious.  
Without measurement, without time, of course, there would be no physics...'existence' [as practiced on Earth.] Well, that is problematic. Let's see. If I should move from one room to another, in 'time' I cease to exist in the present in the room I 'was' in, nevertheless, I remain measurable, and as a 'probability' will remain so, that is the essence of physics, all of science, actually. Yet, I will never, ever again, be in that 'past' room again, due to the 1.6 km/hr speed of our universe as conjectured today, (hope I got that right from). So measurement, and 't' also must conform to the 'probability', again, of repeating a state. Thus, physical existence can seem to be quite nebulous, when you think about it.  
Someone who looks at porn too often :(
You already showed me yours... What motivation do I have now to show you mine?
&gt; With the current state of the economy and dilapidated infrastructure, funding the problems of other nations isn't a prudent expense.  Ok, now you're trolling.  Dilapidated infrastructure?  Can you please point out which portions of the United States are without power, water or usable roads?  As far as funding goes, the United States sends billions every year to other countries so they can buy weapons to oppress their neighbors.  I'm glad fiscal responsibility tells us to spend more money on funding misery in the world verses saving some people from easily preventable nutritional deficiencies.  If you just said we should trust things to work out for the Ethiopians,  there wouldn't have been anything to argue about.  Instead you pointed out it's too expensive to fix the problem and in some perverse way, it's fucking demeaning.  I'm sure that's what they worry about while they lay inert on their cots.
[Here's mine](http://imgur.com/m2fR9.jpg).
The next DLC coming out this year will feature new level caps.
CTRL+F, "wiz", upvote.
Any ideas on how to safely flip a car during a riot?
I've got a sick baby today. Nothing's funny.
Oh snap!
This is basically why they did it.
Nothing for Banksy's little film huh? surprising given what Ive heard about it.
I do it to kids but I think that's different. I call my daughter baby but I couldn't imagine calling a friend that.. Maybe I'm the weird one :) 
I've done pretty good about not looking at porn. I almost went looking for it the other day, but somehow got distracted.  I will admit that I've been in a sort of flirty relationship with this girl and have subsequently been ripping my dick off because of her.  Not sure if that counts or not, but at least I havent been casting my eyes upon the same old filth.
Also, do you realize that you're calling me out on my lack of originality in a subreddit dedicated to a single meme taken from 4chan?
I find that connection between VANOC and the group being removed to be quite the stretch.
You know it's bad when Vomit_Sandwich thinks you're a dick.
You need some more toilet there, buddy. 
Yeah, but I'd also rather avoid the spate of [zebra-crossing related fatalities](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Races_and_species_in_The_Hitchhiker's_Guide_to_the_Galaxy#Babel_fish) that would produce.  EDIT: Link added for those too young to have read Hitch-hikers Guide to the Galaxy.
This is a job I was made for.
The real trollface actually comes from [Rape Rodent](http://images.encyclopediadramatica.com/images/a/a2/Raperodent.jpg)
I like that my approach to my computer is the same as my approach to my room. Don't throw anything away, and when I need to clean I just put everything in boxes and shuffle them off somewhere under my bed.
Prone bone like at the end is the best feeling ever.
&gt; Coakley:  [The device] had a very sinister appearance. It had a battery behind it, and wires.  http://www.wired.com/table_of_malcontents/2007/02/mooninite_bombs/
Wow, that article makes a *huge* deal out of some seemingly very minor issues. Copyright date? Really?
oh, believe me, them bitches in pain.
see my reply to tolas, but i did forget to mention these guys : http://bbxpress.net/   We have an account with them as well that we use when we're crusing.
http://dl.dropbox.com/u/57649/pics/miscellaneous%20pics/desktopcube4.png
Odd.  I seem to feel that it is people with lower self esteem that try to rush into the next relationship without really taking stock of themselves.  Like they can't be alone.
Okay. Biologist here.  First step in identification: Where are you on earth?  Second step: When was this photo taken?  I have a couple of hypotheses, but I don't want to lead you down the wrong path. gimme the time/place, and lets see where we can go from here 
My laptop...it's a trooper that's for sure. I'm constantly pushing my graphics card/processor to the limit but nothing bad has happened quite yet. I often run C4D rendering large graphics while simultaneously working on +500M files in Photoshop and playing music/videos.
I was involved in a fraternity in my younger days and one of the boys had too much to drink and passed out in the living room.  After the usual penises and whatnot, his shirt was removed and a coconut bra put on.  Then followed a good, old-fashioned antiquing with flour.  It was late summer and he was wearing shorts, so the obvious choice next was to paint his legs purple (we were painting something purple earlier that day).  Large, woolen socks were placed on his hands and someone wrote "I LOVE MITTENS" on his chest.  We called him mittens for some time thereafter.  The coup de grâce was a pickle in a condom tucked into the back of his boxers.  I didn't see this happen, but saw him on the couch sometime early morning when I had come down to the kitchen for water.  A few hours later, I hear his door open so I pop out into the hallway and we chat long enough for others to wake up too (all the while distracting him from going to the restroom).  We were all chatting when he finally had to go.  He turned and I saw the condom hanging out of his boxers and absolutely lost it.
[The government statistics would disagree with you](http://www.bced.gov.bc.ca/reports/pdfs/student_stats/prov.pdf).  The total headcount stats shows a steady decline.  And that is over the entire province, some districts grew and some declined even more than the average.
From what I understand, the quality of the connections is worse on the PC version and there is more room for malicious exploits on the PC version as well.   [Article on Ars](http://arstechnica.com/gaming/news/2009/11/pc-modern-warfare-2-its-much-worse-than-you-thought.ars)  To expand on what I wrote: What works on consoles, doesn't necessarily work on the PC.
You can look it up in history books but in the first part of the Korean war America was about to go home defeated, they were unprepared, unfit and had ineffective weapons, among them anti-thank weapons that were not functioning. The boys back there were battered and   scared shitless. That is not coming from sinophiles, that comes from American history books and MacArthur himself. Now you misunderstood what i said, America was about to be defeated by the North Koreans who were very well armed and very motivated and used to fighting in the extreme cold and shitty condition. 
Hey that was cool. Good stuff.
There is a chance that they can get him insurance prior to the diagnosis...  and just give it time to kick in.  Either that, or see if someone can get him on medicaid and SSI.
How do you still have a positive comment karma?
Spicy Mustard, Russian, or Thousand Island?  My family started and still franchises a small chain of sub shops.  They've always held that Spicy Mustard is proper.  They also keep Thousand Island around for heretics and heathens.
you're all incorrect, keep guessing!
Human beings: Overpopulated: Check Poop on everything (having personally cleaned a movie theater stall after a customer shit all over the toilet seat, floor, stall door, and wall...): Check Turn lakes unswimmable: Check Loud: Check Mean: Check Crowd out native animal species: Check   :)
would women like their ovaries to be played with in the same manner !?
Actually, they probably did want to put you into either the nuke or CT programs, and you'd be more or less guaranteed of getting that A school. Of the multitudes of bad promises the recruiters give you, that's not one of them.  If you get a high enough score on the ASVAB, yeah they do kind of flip out, it reflects highly upon them when they can fill high demand/undermanned billets, such as nuke or CT.
none, aside from the obvious
No wonder, it's about 23 times louder than my current volume setting...and fucking stupid.
You don't want to use aluminum foil on the inside.  The creases in the foil focus light.  Use a flat white surface or mylar instead.  Definitely look into LST'ing the plant, and good luck! 
You could throw a 30d at my dining room table as hard as you can and not break it. Even if it chipped, the structure isn't going to shatter. 
haven't seen the movie... [anyway](http://i.imgur.com/ZNtV2.png).
Holy shit we've gone to hyperspace!
Update: We broke up.  I couldn't be happier.
*laughs uproariously*
Masturbate 
Halo is for kiddies.  Crysis is for adults.  Edited: Sorry.  I'm being a dick.  Both are good.  
Yeah, stellar refutation there.  Please feel free to continue your Red Chinese fantasy without making any points.
You are beautiful. Don't worry about your measurements.
That would be the polite/mature thing to do.  Or you could point and snicker.
just been to france and these guys were brilliant. book accomm, searched for places to go to, the lot. Can't say good enough about them.
Am i the only one looking at these just see if they can identify all the icons? firefox gaim(pidgin now)  steam ventrillo and painshop pro? or something like that
Most of them. Innuits love crack....Swedes prefer rocking chairs...If you own a Wii you probably like to choke yourself... and so forth.   
You'd think people would be smarter than that, but I guess not.  I just don't understand how people can be so stupid.  Be honest, have you ever been duped by something as stupid as this?
It needs to be on an official map; one from the mappack. Nothing to do with the game name.
The whole fun of 4-wheeling is getting yourself into those "oh fuck" moments.  Just make sure your driver isn't an idiot or else you'll end up like we [did this summer](http://www.freighttrainbattleship.com/images/RollOver%20013.JPG)
It's the accounting notes that give it away
You do realize that Unobtanium is a broad term to describe any prohibitively costly or hard to obtain resource that is actually used in engineering right? They weren't trying to be inventive, they were trying to be realistic, although most people probably just go "that's stupid" because it's a rather unknown bit of jargon.
What about a boiling interest and basic/conversational skills? I'd probably join the Navy just to master Russian and put it to use, but getting stuck with a language like Arabic or Chinese would make it a very long, tedious, and regrettable six years. 
what about in your ass?
She could demonstrate how to open a bag of potato chips and I'd watch it.
Isn't it funny how the SAME EXACT ARTICLE IS ABOVE YOURS? But yes that guy i hope reverses the stereotypes of addiction and such.
looks like a piece of slime in a pond to me
Well seeing as I don't believe in absolute values for money your original post really doesn't hold much weight for me.  Unless you are now trying to argue against your own point which you were just trying to make 5 hours ago.  Please try to stay consistent. 
If you're interested in 35mm DIY pinholes, also check out the [matchbox pinhole](http://www.matchboxpinhole.com/). I made one of these myself last summer and it was a blast to use. Not quite as reusable as this model, though... Be sure to keep a notebook with your exposure settings so that when you get the roll developed, you can get a feel for exposure times and lighting conditions. Oh, and also make sure you have access to a "real" lab; Walgreens isn't going to know what to do with the non-standard exposure size.
I get it - because of the song. by the artist vitamin c. You know the one. It was the only song released by any artist that year. 
dumb ass-girl
It's a good book, but it's also designed around people who are home all day, like housewives.  It is often more time consuming than difficult, but at least it can only help one's technique.
*Shrugs* Personally, I wouldn't mind. In fact, I'm always encouraging my girl to watch porn. Hopefully it'll make her hornier, that can be only good.  I'm not really concerned about guys from porn... I doubt she'll compare them to me and stop liking me. I don't think I'm inferior to those guys either. The fact I'm bigger than the average porn star may help though (in fact I tease her by telling her to Google and compare), but there are other things such as muscles or blue eyes which I don't have, and I still can't bring myself to worry about it. My girl loves me for more than my body anyways.
I immediately joined this group.
nope that's not it at all.
Nope. Couldn't do it.
I've been going to 4chan for a long time. You can't tell me /wg/ is as bad as /b/
Says the guy who has never seen a feral cat infestation...
So it was.
Are you in KC?  And preparing a 2010 Kauffman Foundation grant application?
Fucking unsympathetic rancor.
somebody's lonely
The demonic result of a one-night stand between a tarantula and a velociraptor.  Taraptual or Tarantulaptor.
I'm nowhere near being an expert but, shit, just shut the engine off, you can still stop/steer a car without power steering/brakes if your not a complete pussy. Just the other day I was in a full-size pickup that wouldn't run, being towed at 45mph by a little chevy malibu - you have to be a bit more deliberate, but you still have pretty good control. I know lots of folks are pretty clueless when it comes to cars, and I'm not expecting average joe to be a mechanic, but it honestly scares me that people need help with this kind of thing. SHUT OFF CAR - PRESS HARDER ON BRAKES BECAUSE YOU WON"T HAVE POWER ASSIST. Even my 63 y/o, completely non-technical mother understands that.
[Myspace](http://www.myspace.com/bendinilambertlocke) page and all.  Impressive.
Your virginity?
do unto others as you would have them do unto you
Ditto
DVDs and CDs DEFINITELY go bad, sometimes after just a couple years. I've lost access to a ton of old back-ups due to this. The dye layer breaks down or something.
Which is what I find most interesting about this story. It appears that facebook is not an appropriate place to organize political protests. 
There is no such thing as too tall.
There were already troops in Afghanistan.  Boosting troop numbers does not start a war.
You just lost the immortal game.
Damn the post sorta got my blood pumping
I agree completely. That was a surprisingly poignant scene I thought. 
You just made a spaghetti carbonara sandwich.  Wow.  I'm impressed.
Racism is different from discrimination.  Racism is the blatant acceptance of the institution as it treats different skin colors.  IE, moving away from poor people, who happen to be black, causing huge power/privilege differences.  Discrimination is an act.  Metro Detroit, as a racist community, is largely segregated.  
Hey! They do lot's of important work. There are a couple in my hometown and they ride beautiful horses.
[Alito: Right to Privacy not Guaranteed by Constitution](http://www.theonion.com/content/news/right_to_privacy_not_guaranteed_by)
I actually just did it a few minutes ago with my pot pie. :(  Make me even more sad knowing that taste buds dont heal, but have to be replaced about every 2 weeks.
The DHD has built-in protocols to prevent a wormhole intersecting a solar flare, thus the jury-rigged DHD allowing that problem to happen.  The 38 time limit could be an artefact of the physics involved.  That they don't know how to force shutdown doesn't mean the system doesn't support it, they just haven't figured that out yet.  The part about it exploding probably relates to the Lantian anti-wraith weapon.  The gates in Pegasus are a newer design than the Milky Way ones.  This could be a bug specific to their design, that was never fixed due to the war.  So there:P
Yeah I understand that it's pretty easy in software, but I sorta want to do optically. 
&gt; *  Thanks for the formatting help !  &gt;You say "our culture" but what culture are you referring to? I'm Irish living in London and I've found cultural differences even us close neighbours with the same language and a lot of the same entertainment media.   Ah yes, I find I have a bad tendency to confuse capitalist culture with actual culture.  That is to say, I have a false notion of us all living in a somewhat shared culture of imposed idols such as actors, athletes and politicians, advertising culture, consumer culture.  Whereas culture can and often is something foreign of these things.   Im an english Canadian living in Vancouver, So although I see a lot of different culture on the outside, I don't necessarily participate in it, that is a lot of varied Asian cultures, Indian and Pakistani, some Middle Eastern and less so European immigration and African. We have a good deal of sub culture that I have somewhat participated in - drug culture, music culture, art and so forth, unique to Vancouver. Of course internet culture as well is a new sort of frontier.   &gt;If this is true, then are you saying it was ever different to this? Or wasn't it always that there are crowds of people who prefer the minority do a lot of the learning &amp; exploration and they will happily fund and follow?  Im saying it's not possible for me to know if it was ever different, So Ill suppose it was probably always this way.  There is a subtle point ive infused without clarifying. That is that knowledge was always considered very dangerous, perhaps the bourgeois to a lesser extent but more fundamentally the church viewed knowledge as something that must not fall into the hands of the common people - the very same with fascism and the rise of propaganda, that if the 'common people' or the 'proles', Us, ever gained access to the vastness that is human knowledge we would realize our equality and revolutionize the world. And so far things remain fundamentally the same, the same power structure, the same exploitation.  So its not so much that the crowd allowed the few to control them, they were goaded into it through psychological manipulation, through fear of god or force of arms.   &gt; By the way, it's modern people or modern humanity but it hasn't been modern man in ages.  I stand corrected.  &gt; In any case, this is a classic rhetorical question with no answer at all.  True, only used the Greece reference as one of the foundations of the idea of the Republic and freedom of thought, the birthplace of western philosophy. Trying to appeal to your emotions ;P  &gt;Although you may be right about the education system, I don't believe you are right in thinking that this represents our willingness to learn. People may not always want to know "the truth" but I find that people do want to continue to learn, particularly those who are prevented from it.  Yes it seems that when something is is forbidden it is sweeter, I touched on this in the paragraph above and I want to tie my reply into some other things you said ...  &gt; I hear classical music because that's the station I choose. &gt; I avoid ads but I agree that there are way too many ads. However, there are movements against these and places where there are no ads. &gt; And then there's freedom, which you define in terms of politics alone. &gt; Freedom is being able to move - mentally, physically and emotionally. A person in a jail cell can have a free mind.  Indeed freedom is all about choice, and I reconcile freedom with government because it seems to be lagging behind, because of the nature of the human race and this notion being discussed about - to put this bluntly and arrogantly - quite stupid, and happy that way. Now, usually I don't defend myself because offended people are much more honest, but I respect you so in the spirit of life in its true form, that is dancing, polarity, resonance, ill tell you that I know im not in the clouds with some men, Eg. Nietzche or more modern Zizek, nor artistically like Poe, Shakespeare ect ect. Ill (probably  [probably only because im not the same man I was yesterday, it would really be arrogant to assume I knew a man ive never met, my future self]) never be a great philosopher or thinker, but ill do my damned best.   I see myself as what the bare minimum should be for intellect in our society, and its disheartening to see such a lack of enthusiasm from those I encounter everyday.  It seems government lags behind because of this - that if 51% of people don't give a damn if their system is corrupt it screws it up for the rest of us, this is how society, government, and culture become stirred together. So while we do have the limited freedom of personal choice, we are powerless in this system to create any real change, save some catalyzing hero to stimulate the masses. I deny only that this is pessimistic, for I see it as accurate. Narrow mindedness has always been a fault of mine.   Might I bother you for your thoughts on this notion ?  Oh, and enjoy your granola. 
no.
IT IS INEVITABLE  Everyone will need an ID on the web soon... Everyone over legal miniomum age. 
seafood, all of it.  Even lobster ick!  The cockroach of the sea...blech!
[There you go](http://imgur.com/NAtZT.jpg). No cleaning up done there, I like to keep it basic.
Never saw that happen. People are usually polite but reserved, and generally don't stare, so I guess they'd ignore it. There's an automatic social formality that people stick to. Despite the fact that I was probably the first naked white guy a lot of these Korean dudes had ever seen, I never thought that I was being stared at.  In the women side, on the other hand, my foreigner friends would tell me that Korean women would be *really* friendly. One girl I knew was getting her back scrubbed down before she even knew what was happening.  Meanwhile, here in Toronto, the last time I went to work out at my local gym I noticed that they're installing separate shower stalls. It's not because I want to oggle naked people or anything that this disturbs me - it's just a subtle sign that we're becoming even more insecure with our bodies. We're letting the advertising and fashion industries win.
I'm married with kids.  It's the only place I can hide.  ;)
shocking is good, thats kind of how i feel about martyrs, I didn't 'enjoy' it. But still thought it was a good movie. 
the only part that should be patched is using the quad to blow up the objective. If you are able to stand there and plant 3-6 c4s without dying, you should be allowed to blow up the objective...
MacBook Wheel is my favorite too. Very well made.
Watership down. I was anticipating a Disney-esque romp with rabbits but got death instead.
Interesting.
Not only did I come here to post this, I cam preapred with that same exactl clip. I just watched this movie for the first time about an hour ago and it was incredible.  &gt;Mark: How was work today?  &gt;Johnny: Oh pretty good. We got a new client… at the bank. We make a lot of money.  &gt;Mark: What client?  &gt;Johnny: I can not tell you, its confidential.  &gt;Mark: Oh come on. Why not?  &gt;Johnny: No I can’t. Anyway, how is your sex life?
I have always loved the explanations of the typeface choices that is in the back of some books.
My all time favourite? Local Lutheran minister loves to fuck his wife  :) http://www.theonion.com/content/node/29788
OMG this movie scared the hell out of me.  I still feel weird around mirrors.  However when I watch the [trailer](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3DFacqQp8uw) now I can't believe its a disney movie.
I've never had any issue downshifting with an automatic even at highway speeds.  But it doesn't happen instantaneously, it disengages into neutral and waits for your speed to be low enough to shift a gear down.  You'd need to be braking at the time.
Love that song
&gt;His massive ego having been so gently caressed and having a sudden regain of energy he thought he could go toe to toe with China. That's when things got interesting.  The U.S. could have taken the whole of Korea. We're forgetting a lot of history here. It was 1950. The only two relevant powers were the U.S. and Soviet Union. The Chinese Army were still peasants. The reason the U.S. didn't take the whole of Korea was due to lack of political will to commit sufficient manpower (the Chinese were incurring massive losses in men). The election of Eisenhower was the nail in the coffin for the war. It was very similar to what happened in Vietnam.
That sounds actually perfect. He told me last night that the day we when we hung out, things weren't really serious between them. We hung out 5 days before they announced their engagement. He's freaking out at me cause he's terrified I'm going to tell her, but now I really have no way of telling her. I don't know the girl, but I know Scott, and he's a cheater, he's a liar, and he's always number one on his list. I hope that she doesn't get her heart broken. 
I don't think we need a minimum wage. People should have minimum wages that they think they are worth and seek jobs that pay that. 
Harry Blackstone.
error: too few arguments to function ‘socket’ :-/
Maybe it's upset by the huge booger someone wiped on the wall next to it.
is there a way to use mutt to do this?
[Nohavica's theory of alcoholics hill.(NTAH)](http://imgur.com/tYezY.jpg) *NOHAVICOVA TEORIE ALKOHOLIKOVA KOPCE (NTAK)* This looks like joke, but it isn't guys. There is a hill (H), right? At the foot of the hill, there is an avarage man, right? He does drinks like a fish, and he is going up the hill. When he goes up the hill, everything is fine. Absolutely, completely fine. What is messed up, is the top of the hill, tiny point. There is break point, or point of no return, if you will... After that, finito, end. Doctors won't help you, shrinks won't help you, You, yourself won't help you. Complete dead end. So, where is the problem? what is going on? Well, someone drinks his whole life and nothing hapens. Why? Because his hill is really, really high. He is just climbing, whole his life, up the hill. Unfortunately, none of us knows how high your hill is...
I mean, you can use the fact that you actually understand very basic web design concepts better than him as leverage for these changes.  Explain to him the advantages of such things, explain to him that external stylesheets stop the web server from having to serve the same content redundantly (and show him how slow the site loads because of the flash and huge images), and don't be an ass about it.  If you're nice and explain things and give him tips, the benefit is he'll get to learn something and be more successful in the future, your father's website will be more successful, and you'll have a nice amount of self-satisfaction.  Here are some tips you can give this gentlemen to improve upon this webpage:  * Move all of the CSS into a single, external stylesheet.  It's easier to maintain and change one file as opposed to 4+.  Also, for some reason he attempted to comment out the CSS with &lt;!-- --&gt;? * **CSS**: Use more specific CSS selectors, general names like "class1" etc are very hard to maintain if anyone else is to ever edit this site.  If class1 makes the text red and bold, then try a name like "redbold", etc. * **Flash**: Don't use Flash for the navigation.  This is one you have to insist on.  It's incredibly unnecessary, and it's going to shoot your dad in the foot.  Why?  Most importantly, because the iPhone and other mobile browsers can't do flash.  When I'm out with my friends and we're looking for a restaurant, I'll usually pull out my iPhone and look for their website and menu.  If you can't see the navigation to get to the menu, then uh-oh. * **Frames**: I don't understand the point of the pretty much null frame.  Someone fill me in here? * **HTML Tables**: Don't get me started, but tables are very restrictive and haven't been the proper recognized way to make layouts since before most of us were in middle school.  All in all, it seems like he used some sort of WSYWIG in combination with basic HTML/CSS knowledge, and what you get is a mess.  Ok, fine, he got the job done at its very basic level, but $250 is a lot these days.  If I could get $250 for designing something of that quality, I'd be rolling in dough.  You should definitely make sure that the basics are met, or else you're just paying him to be nice and not doing what's best for your father's business.
Cool!  It's a cup of origami popcorn!
I just remember thinking it was terrible. 
I *hate* holding pages open just the right amount—open enough to read, but not enough to break the binding...
Sad fish is yummy.
&gt;I seriously doubt that you do either.  HAHA   Nice, baseless assumption.Do you enjoy that kind of wild speculation about people whom you don't even know?   I bet you imagine yourself to be clever!   What is your basis for (blindly) 'accepting' the big bang theory?  You sound like just another dogmatist. You might as well be accepting the crap that Scientology teaches...just because many people say it is true!  You can make excuses, but you are still just a deluded dogmatist, following voodoo pseudo-scientific dogma!  
Do you have a non-spoilery summation? As in, what are your thoughts about the episode, minus any spoilers?
&gt; I'm fed up with capitalism and corporations being portrayed as somehow evil. It's not possible for corporations to be evil. Evil is a moral concept that is applicable to the people in a corporation, but not to the organisation itself.  That's true, capitalism and corporations are not immoral but amoral. I'm sick of people confusing the two and assuming that just because an entity is designed to appropriate and maximize the utility of everything without any form of moral judgment entering consideration it is somehow automatically "evil". After all, people don't consider humans who don't have the capacity to distinguish right from wrong to be particularly dangerous now do they?
She looks like that all of the time.
Really, the attraction's website says, "this is lame, so don't bother coming"?
&gt; We had AANR certification so open sex and erections were not allowed.   Referring to the erections... how is this supposed to be enforced?  I guess for a seasoned veteran it would not be hard to suppress it in public, but for a nudist newbie how are they supposed to ignore natural urges.  Like, sometimes I don't get a hard-on by choice that won't exactly go quietly into the night right away.
As someone who has also worked with that kind of glassware, it definitley does have an HP, or at least a set amount of vibration the top can handle. I dropped a glass from 6 ft up, watched it bounce 5 times on the way to the floor, and have it shatter when it rolled across one of the grout lines in the tile. Fucking tempermental things. 
SJS FTW
Dude, you were texting in 8th grade?
Because then you have the risk of an accidental shut off. 3 taps would be good (and intuitive, since people tend to pound on buttons when panicked or in a hurry), in addition to the 3-second function.
What did you expect?  You watch a video, see a picture, or read an article and all your pains go away?  Its going to take time, and a positive mental outlook.  Saying things like, "but does nothing to alleviate the pain" is melodrama and negative thinking. Yes, this video CAN do something to alleviate the pain, your perspective it just skewed at the moment cause you are just a little down in the dumps.  Activities, staying busy, these are constructive.
how do you normally turn your car off after you're done driving it? :S
Have you ever done the Galleon Challenge(one galleon of milk in one hour)?  Now *that* is hard.  I only tried once and missed it by about 2 cups.
Sorry to be a grammar nazi.
Start with 1/2 the ingredients? 
I made 4 hardboiled eggs yesterday and let the shells sit out over night to dry on a paper towel. This afternoon the shells were incredibly brittle and easily turned to powder in my little coffee grinder. The end result was about 4 1/2 teaspoons of egg dust which I was careful not to inhale.   I have the 1/2 teaspoon of the powder soaking in the juice from half a lime. When I added the powder the mixture foamed up similar to when you add vinegar and baking soda. I'm going to soak the mix for 8 hours in the lime juice, at this point, about 4 hours in, the mixture resembles watery egg whites and is fairly revolting.   I will probably end up tasting a bit but then adding the bulk to a fruit smoothie rather than drink it all straight. 
The Uncharted games, no question. Also, inFamous is fantastic. It may put you off at first but there's a great story here along with fun as hell platforming and action.  Plus, you have Heavy Rain to look forward to, along with FFXIII and God of War 3. 
Awww, a man who's both good with his hands and an animal lover!  Nice project. :)
I know that music is totally opinionated but i always have this thought that if you appreciate music and musician ship that this would appeal to SOME side of you.
How long will they put up with this?
"When fascism comes to America, it will be draped in the flag and carrying a cross." - Sinclair Lewis
&gt; This is interesting. When people argue that compilers are better at optimizing large chunks of code, I wonder how many actually have experience to back it up.  It depends on the structure of the code.  Compilers are good at deleting large amounts of abstraction (like inlined C++ templates that don't do anything). They're also good at folding together lots of scalar operations, or moving them out of loops.  They specifically aren't good at memory operations (either array operations or doing a lot of stuff with struct members), because they think a lot of random other parts of the code introduce memory aliasing when they don't. That's what happens here.
Football/Soccer Power
They really don't pay attention to who is sponsoring them in their broadcasts.  And if it bothers you that they have to be corporate sponsored to stay on the air, they have their annual fundraiser.
If the koth config has been run, it should be "r3dd1tk0th". But otherwise it should stay "r3dd1t".
broken?
Fuck communicating with a computer or telephone. Anybody who finds enjoyment talking with other people in front of an electronic device has lost touch with their humanity. But that's just my opinion, as stupid as it is.
Jesus christ dude. I hope that was copy pasta
No, I've never worried about getting pushed overboard - I'm a single-hander.   You may know exactly what you're talking about, but what you do isn't going to be right for everyone, whether on a body-goal or mental/spiritual level. And frankly, the self-righteous and condescending way you write really dulls the effectiveness of your message. Unless you're trying to perpetuate the dim muscle-head stereotype, in which case you're doing a fantastic job. 
Well, as some people have pointed out, I don't live in a terrible area. I live in a decent area that is inner-city.
Hopefully this will come and go quickly, like that "HDR" shite.
This was on icanhascheezburger a while back with the caption 'too much caffeine? Since when?'  or something.
not true, at least according to my experience. I gave it an long opportunity and it failed miserably. 
This is HILARIOUS!!!!
what happened when people got erections?
When you comment on (or submit the text) "trophy case" it gives you an automatic Gullible Trophy.
I started making a secret compartment in a hotel bible.  This is it so far!
Just watch Primer again.
Of course, someone travelling internationally would have their own copies of their medical records, so SHE can easily release the records, right?
**Isa 41:21-27 God challenges / Prophesy** Here is where the weak flee early!
You think? Are stock brokers motivated by all of these things more than they're motivated by money? How about barbers?
The Avatar review IS boring. However, the strength of the reviews (in general) is in the over-the-top character and the expert analysis. He offered no real insight into Avatar, but used most of it as a vehicle to regurgitate his best remembered character bits, which is disappointing.
I am a woman ... so no. :-) 
&gt;white guy tired of people whining  You might start by looking closer to home.
&gt; In fact, I'm happily married to an atheist  Oh the depravity! You'd marry one of us just to keep your cover?! The scandal of it all!!
Here is how I see it.  People who think that their lawyers are "the best" probably had a good outcome with their case.  It doesn't necessarily mean they are the best, it just means that they are competent.  For most legal matters, you don't need the best.  You just need somebody that is competent.  There are plenty of competent lawyers in every city who would achieve the same result if given your case.  That is why it is important to  speak with multiple people and research their recommendations or go in for a consultation yourself.  You need to find the attorney that is right for you.  I can't imagine anybody recommending someone who is not competent just to save face for their bad decision making.  I would like to hope that your friends/family would have your best interests in mind when dispensing advice related to an important legal matter.  Do your friends recommend you to bad doctors just because they used them in order to save face? I just don't see it happening.   
I found this book to have some very powerful tools in it.  Not so much in the field for building attraction, (although it could depending on how you use it), but once attraction is established I found I could have strong emotional effects on her.  The way I would use it is to pick two or three chapters and try to invoke them on date 2 or 3.  I realized later that this makes it much easier to explain to a girl that you're not going to be exclusive per se, and she will comply because she simply cannot resist.
eh, people can adapt to the shower issue without too much problem.  University of California Berkeley has communal bathrooms with individual showers in some of their dorms.
MY CAR!!!
I remember when it wasn't newfag, but gaiafag.  Too bad /b/ was never good.
Dude, Mine too. I think it's the force.
Any time, lol.  I plan to go to the Finale there... otherwise I'll be busy that time of night in either A) class of B) workin' on our own TV show at UT.  Oh well... huzzah for HD rips.
First, thanks so much for that map.  I have been unable to find such a map and it will be really helpful as I am currently working on a school project to study possible ways to make MARTA more successful. DISCLAIMER:  I am not an attorney or other licensed professional, nor have I gotten to the point of the project that I can even say I have done due diligence to the point that anything contained in this post should be taken as authoritative.  However, it provides me the opportunity to get some brainstorming done, and, hopefully, y’all can learn something about what I consider one of the most important issues facing our city. As for your question, the short answer is that MARTA (or another agency tied in with MARTA infrastructure) will eventually have to provide additional mass transit because our roads are already beyond capacity to the point of hindering growth.  Hopefully, the Beltline project will spur interest in transit-oriented planning.  Of course, those corridors are merely proposed and would not be built in exactly that form, should they be built at all.  As for progress, there has been very little, but that is changing.  There is a bill before the Legislature this session that will allow the regions to impose their own public transport taxes.  One of the biggest problems facing MARTA is that legislators from outside the city do not want to be seen to support a city-only project.  I am not sure how long you have live here, but the “Two Georgias” problem is a very real political problem.  This new bill will alleviate that problem; however, MARTA is only supported by Fulton and Dekalb counties within the Atlanta region.  Without support of the entire region, MARTA will be unable to grow. Growing support in the Atlanta region will prove difficult.  There are over a hundred local governments in the region.  While the Atlanta Regional Commission (ARC) is a politically powerful organization, it lacks the legal power to get much done.  I believe ARC is presenting in class tomorrow, so I can expand on this point tomorrow evening.  GRTA, on the other hand, has a lot of legal power (you need GRTA permission for a curb cut to install a driveway) and, iirc, $2B of bonding authority.  That means that GRTA could, in theory, issue $2B of debt without having to ask the legislature.  The problem with GRTA-led development is that it is common knowledge that the Legislature would shut GRTA down if it actually used its legal power. So, the issue comes down to getting support from the other counties in the Atlanta Region.  This is a very difficult political task.  The demographics of the MARTA ridership are very different from the suburban commuters who are necessary to justify expanding MARTA.  One thing that can be done is to put more capable people in charge of the MARTA Police.  According to a friend on the APD, the Five Points Rail Station is the favorite hangout of known gang members anywhere in the city.  While I don’t see much evidence of crime occurring in and around the station (or even notice gang members loitering), commuters are not going to want to change trains at a station associated with gangs. Of course, the biggest problem with MARTA is that it doesn’t go anywhere.  I plan on focusing most of my project on solving this issue.  It is my opinion that MARTA will not be able to expand until (almost) every rail station serves a true “destination.”  If you go to most rail stations, you will find that they are surrounded by surface parking.  I plan on proposing that MARTA strive to completely move away from surface parking. There should be, at least, two models used for station development.  First, the suburban stations at or near the end of lines should be designed to facilitate dual-mode commutes.  While dual-mode commutes are neither popular nor ideal, MARTA has had success with the idea.  Commuters who live near a station have shown that they are willing to drive to a station and take the train into the city to avoid traffic.  I am not sure, but I am pretty sure that the traffic starts farther out than North Springs.  Of course, there are no MARTA stations remotely close to millions of people in the suburbs.  This gets us back into a discussion of building stations with money MARTA doesn’t have, many of which will need to be in non-MARTA counties, so more stations are not an immediate solution. In the city, MARTA, along with the City Council, Mayor’s Office, ARC, and many other governmental entities, needs to focus on transit-oriented development.  We need to find an effective way to promote high-density development around MARTA stations.  Plain and simple, people that own cars are not going to take a train into the city if they will have to get on a bus to get to their destination.  Therefore, we need destinations within walking distance of rail stations.  The downtown stations have decent destinations by being located in a dense area.  Midtown is also in decent shape, and, once the economy recovers, I would assume that the Midtown growth boom will continue.  Lindbergh station is actually well-respected in the planning community as an example of successful transportation oriented development(TOD), and you can see that the development associated with the station is not even that extensive. However, stations on the South side, pretty much the entire East-West rail line, and several stations on the North Side are just surrounded by parking.  I swear you can walk from East Point Station to Ft. Mac Station without ever leaving a parking lot.  We need to encourage development physically attached to the stations, preferably with covered (climate controlled?) walkways so people can get into the buildings without going out in bad weather.  This development can be anything: condos, office space, retail.  As a Midtown resident and New Urbanism kind of guy, I would hope for mixed-use development.  With destinations at each stop, ridership will rise to levels necessary to justify expansion.  Additionally, more riders means more voters who support MARTA and can put political pressure on state and local governments to extend the service area. Of course, we are talking about an agency that is so broke that it can barely afford to run busses, much less fund development on its own.  There are several alternatives.  My preferred solution is to encourage developer finance for TODs.  The most common method is to give a five(or so) year property tax waiver to developers who build TODs.  Another method I’ve been exploring is that MARTA could literally give developers the parking lots subject to conditions that they would build TODs and provide MARTA parking in their decks or lease the lots with consideration being construction of the TOD and MARTA parking.  Finally, MARTA does have some capital improvement funding that cannot be used for operations.  This money could be used to fund some TODs, especially if the agency wanted to build another “demo TOD” like Lindbergh Station. I hope this was helpful and/or interesting.  As you can see, I am very early into the project, so I don’t really have many sources or data yet.  That being said, feel free to ask me anything you want.  Reddit posts are as good a method as brainstorming as anything else, and you may give me a good idea, which I will cite to, if possible. 
I am a female and this happens to me too. i am definitely straight but some how tits just capture my focus. Its really bad, I have been caught a number of times now.   Meh, whatever though, I am sure it happens to a lot of people, they have a way of drawing attention.
I heard that's one of those things people like to do on the internet.
Doctors are not journalists.  Doctors should never make a fucking mockery of their patients the way these guys are.  Journalists have an obligation to show us horrible images, Doctors have an obligation to their patients. 
Ah, I didn't even know about this ability. I've only done it on Heroic once so far, and I just went "Mirrored Soul? What's that?" and kept on blasting away at the boss. I'm glad they put in such difficult content though. The new Icecrown Citadel 5-man dungeons are really the only ones that are still a challenge (and perhaps TotCh). I anticipate that Emblem-bought gear in Cataclysm will be much more expensive than it is now. It's almost trivial to gear up at the moment.
Not a movie, but the Dr Who episode [The Ark in Space](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Ark_in_Space) literally had me hiding behind the sofa in 1975 at the age of 8. The gradual transformation of people into insects was terrifying.
Not really anything wrong with that!  People often find things humourus in real life.
Probably still there to support the troops we still have in Korea.
pet cemetary ---- zelda scene http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qnXogeyxVQA
I'm surprised nobodies mentioned Vector. Slick, fast Slackware that just screams on old hardware. Not Ubuntu easy, but very nice.
Nope.
I am strangely fascinated by this pronunciation of "of" thing.  It will blow your mind if you think about it too much.  Ov.
The Little Shop of Horrors (original B&amp;W version)  Jack Nicholson was very disturbing as the sadistic dentist and the end scene with the blooms portraying the many victims of the plant still creep me out.
Salvation
It might have been something like $1250. But that was going on 30-40 years ago, and I don't think I have any documentation of the price now. And I'm unsure how accurate my memory is regarding the number. But me and my dad invested more into it beyond that-- [a little more money, and a lot of elbow grease](http://www.jmooneyham.com/super_car_project.html).
Flash drive for me as well. I've washed and dried mine on multiple occasions. 
LoL!
Who'd you dive with?  It's been several years since I've been down there, my last dive was Dos Ojos. 
I do this a lot, it's gotten to the point where I'm distracted in fights because I'm trying to shout random things at people.  The best ones are: Charging at people as a heavy with my fists out, screaming, "Run, cowards!"; and watching a pyro set fire to a bunch of team-mates, then, as a scout, running between them all and announcing, "Yo! We're on fire!"
Things like this are why I'm glad I live in SF and why I will never leave. You just don't get that sort of counter-protest absurdity anywhere else.  Instead of a challenging and potentially violent response from people who are angry, you just get someone saying "hey, we're crazy too and we're more creative than you look at us instead!". It works so much better than violence or actually protesting in general.  
Avast. Antivirus software is for the weak.
Context must be a struggle for you. This article is about the UK, the discussion was about UK inheritance tax which hits the middle classes, not just the rich or megarich. Billions are somewhat different as even profligate spending will not even the playing field but for normal people one generation's work is easily undone by a generation's waste. Inheritance tax is not necessary for the estates of those of normal wealth, it's the state stealing something it has no right to.
[spoilers](/s "The episode takes place in three locations 1. on flight 815 2. near the foot of the statue 3. at the hole that used to be the swan station.")
Less dangerous than having the steering lock and plowing into the abyss without control and killing everyone. Neutral would be a far better option. Turning off the ignition would be a stupid move when travelling at any speeds not to mention 120m/hr.
[Hook](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=65PiKsNhCsc)
He was just dropping out of light speed
I for one welcome our new flying penguin overlords!
Neither does being a zoophile or pedosexual.
Something about correlation and causation... 
"Have you ever browsed reddit?"  "Yeah, of course man..."  "But have you ever browsed reddit... *on weeeed*?"
What, specifically, makes you so sure that God wants us to interpret the Bible literally.  There are some things that are obviously symbolic (much of the Prophets) and/or poetic, so it would be a genre mistake to interpret them literally.  People who believe that the first couple chapters of Genesis ought to be seen as figurative argue that the poetic structure of the text itself is evidence that it is in the genre of mythology (mythology given to us by God), but not strict literal history.  The verse people most often use to argue a literalist interpretation is the ol' "God-breathed, and useful for teaching, rebuking, correcting, and training in righteousness," but nowhere in that verse does it say that every word of the Bible is meant to be interpreted literally.  I understand that many Christians disagree with such an interpretation, but why be so adamantly opposed to it?  Why fight an self-defeating culture war over a minor issue of theology?  Even CS Lewis was in favor of Evolutionary Creationism. 
Anyone else having time out issues with that page?
Sure, but the Yale campus is filled with assholes.
Oh no!!!
The building (and perhaps my appliances too) celebrated its 100th birthday the year I lived there. The elevator was really old and being replaced. There must have been some work that they could do without putting the thing completely out of commission (I remember vividly that it required hammering something metal).
I have more money than I can spend on all my alts, I don't think I'm doing it wrong.
Not bad for a human
Practically-speaking, I can see how the analogy makes sense, but I don't think it's very accurate.  Killing creativity is not inherent in the idea of schools, whereas killing civilians is inherent in the idea of air-strikes.  It's true that the way schools are typically "designed" does tend to kill creativity.   Assuming you think this trend is a bad thing (I do), then it's imperative to fight to keep the arts in school and keep business driven practices (like standardized tests and curriculum) curtailed.
The outcome (price being low) doesn't change and that's the joke. The graph however *does* change. The one from Cy&amp;H is exactly the same graph, it doesn't matter if it's upside-down or not.  You could also say the Cy&amp;H graph is point symmetric and the one from mordant orange isn't.
I believe, sir, that you have been trol-- Wait.  Was I just _double trolled_?
What did you do there?  Were you naked while you worked?
I remember seeing the police chief on TV saying, "what were they thinking attaching lights to public spaces this day in age"  Which I found funny because I can't walk down the street without seeing some form of lit advertising. I think if the ads were for FORD or IBM this would not have been a problem.
When you first click on the Mass Effect 2 and the menu pops up, you need to click on "configuration." Then, from that menu, you can find "Import ME 1 Character." You then find the location of the save, and when you start ME2, it should show up. 
I like books. I like having books on my shelf; lending books to friends; opening books and smelling the paper, dust, glue, and ink; the way certain papers look in sunlight vs incandescent vs candlelight. Maybe I'm getting old, but seriously, I think that e-readers are handy but they are actually a negative in terms of reducing one of the remaining "downtime" joys of being alive.   I love going to friends' and new girl's places and seeing what they have on the shelf. I'm not going to scroll through the books on someone's Kindle I just met or popped by to visit; that's weird and creepy.  EDIT: typing skillz needed
That's interesting.  I would have been quite surprised if most men picked the girl on the left. I was pretty blown away that so many men picked the girl on the right - it was almost as many as the middle got.  I myself am somewhere between middle and right and I can't tell you how often I've been called fat. I'm a size 4. 
do me a favor and steal it, hes a bigoted jackass.  damn good author tho, its so conflicting lol.
&gt;&gt; i can't just dogear the pages when i wanna take a break  Yes you can. In fact you don't even need to, as it will automatically remember where you are (in addition to being able to place saved bookmarks wherever you want).
And so she starts showing everyone... [me underwears](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dHXkcZh_kqY&amp;feature=related).
Office Ninja.
Well, if you can't feel pleasure, you aren't exactly qualified to say what does/dosn't give pleasure.  :)  Alcohol gives me a ton of pleasure.  It also gives me a ton of displeasure and guilt sometimes.  It's a love/hate relationship :P
Wow, it took me a while to parse this statement: "Abrams recently appeared before an ACLU panel trying to talk them out of the notion of reversing their opposition to limits on corporate free speech."  So... was he arguing for or against corporate free speech?
I keep a bingo card with all the words to cross off when I use them. It is very inveterate of me isn't it.  oh look I can cross another one off.
Sounds good. Hope you keep it up.
Stuart Littlewood considers the failure of the Iraq Inquiry rigorously to question former Prime Minister Tony Blair about his decision to join the US in committing aggression against Iraq, and reflects on Blair’s use of the inquiry as a platform to promote aggression against Iran.  ”What has been so obvious to the general public all along is that Blair and his co-criminals – the supine cabinet and the main opposition party – failed to exercise due diligence, the thorough investigation and careful regard for information and legal considerations normally expected of a commercial organization before making a large-scale investment. Obviously something similar, at minimum, should apply within government when planning to risk vast sums of taxpayers’ money, innocent lives and national reputation in an armed assault on another country for questionable motives, and for which the leadership might afterwards be held to account."
Me too. I also hope you aren't the moron here. You've been having a great day so far. Noticed your bowel movement was very consistent too, good stuff. I'm really happy to see you looking after yourself.
thanks for clearing that up.
ne'. :) ím egy upvote, hogy haladjunk a komment karma-heaven felé.
When I did my gun safety course I found out that if you own a gun you must notify the police of where you're keeping it within two weeks. If you move you have to notify them of your change of address.  Was very odd to think the police would have such close tabs on you. (They also come to your property and inspect where you keep it stored)
I doubt you'll see this as I'm a bit late to the party. However, what you have described is almost exactly the plot to this BBC show called [Primeval](http://www.tv.com/primeval/show/68346/summary.html)
You know what did have picts? Scotland.
The starting up of negotiations is pretty tricky, and subtle, with a long history of failure on *both* sides.  You're indeed correct - Abbas has set a pre-condition: stop building and expanding the fucking settlements. An endless list of Israeli PMs have pledged this, but it's only been political window dressing - and then (as is now the case with Netanyahu), they back off and more land ends up being stolen.  As a pre-condition, I don't think this is unreasonable.  And you're wrong about Netanyahu - he has already listed a series of demands he expects the Palestinians to meet (although the Israeli spin doctors are saying these are negotiable and not pre-conditions).  It appears that the Americans and Egyptians are trying to find a formula that will work and even Israeli political scientists are saying something is in the air.  But to characterize this as all black and white - the Palestinians are ruining everything and the Israelis are all sweetness and light - is just wrong.  It will be very interesting to see how this plays out, and how Hamas will be integrated, if at all. The current American president seems to be more serious about this than his predecessor.
Maybe you'd like to try r/cheatatmathhomework?
Nightmare on Elm Street.  My babysitter decided that I absolutely had to watch that at 8 years old.  I was scared to sleep for so long... 
How do I pronounce Quebecois?
Cite your sources, I demand to know where you got this idea that we all use winrar. Especially since I don't, combination of Windows7 and 7zip.
&gt;I can't place myself in the gay male stuff. I want a woman there to make it activities I enjoy and can imagine myself partaking in.  I'm the opposite.  I like looking at men, not women, and I'd often rather watch gay porn than straight, since there's no female body to distract me.  Gay porn at least focuses on the male bodies and genitals, even if Tab A is going into Slot C instead of B, while straight porn is all about tits and vajajays and high-pitched moaning.
Most came around except for 'that one guy'.  He's probably a real hoot at parties too. Sex missionary style every time as well. 
For me it was critters, hands down.
http://www.expansys.co.nz/laptops+netbooks/ebook-readers  It's a rock called New Zealand
Did anybody else feel like that video was a scene out of Zoolander?
found a small map on this page: http://www.southvancouvercpc.com/project-trapdoor---vpd-report-on-grow-operation.html
[Bureau Of Alcohol, Tobacco &amp; Firearms Reaches Trade Agreement With Food &amp; Drug Administration](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/28972)
I just kinda grab it and squeeze it out honestly. It's not coming out any other way if I don't have toilet paper.
I read the whole volume this is taken from for a Feminist Epistemology class I took.  She's got some really cool ideas going. 
That's your one e-word for the year (at least it was a good use of the word).
I would say that I've been sympathetic as a white man, and that any thing I do comes from the standpoint of such.  So yes.
Jurassic Park 1 freaking velocoraptors
I guess my main beef with him is that he says people are becoming less complacent with violence. That is, violence is more and more looked down upon. I suppose this is true in the West (Mind you, people still watch Jackass). The question is: Is it true for the rest of the world? Take note of the acid mutilation that was on reddit a while ago and the video of the man being burned alive in Africa (some religious thing).  Also his ill definition of violence. Sure we can look at death rates but what about things such as domestic violence and mutilation. 
agreed, but you will. 
I went to Harrow and i'm not a twat :(
Well, their ordering is undefined, which makes it hard to access anything external with them. And they also generate terrible code.
pawned
Avatar
Flush more than once.
I would recommend that you start with not letting her cum. Bring her right to the edge and then stop. preferably while restraining her.  It shouldn't take long until she is begging for it. Don't give it to her. Call her your toy, or pet. Tell her that she is yours and you can do what you want. "Who's tits are these?", "who's clit is this" until she says they are yours.  Reward and punishment are always good. When something is not perfectly to your liking (perhaps when she is giving head), stop and correct preferably with pinches and strkes to the ass, thigh and back if she has a sensitive back.  Keep in mind once the skin has reddened it is much more sensitive, soft strokes, nails and occasional pinches will get a dramatic reaction.  just controlling her head can add an edge to sex. a firm grip in the back of her neck, or on her Jaw, making her or preventing her from kissing you.  A possessive comment whispered in her ear.   Take time, a lot of time, use it to make he feel as if you can make her feel anything you want, and if you study her reactions you can.  Training is also a lot of fun. Think pet, reward is sexual stimulation and punishment is lack of stimulation or pain.  But as always you are in charge and sometimes you have to punish just because you enjoy it.  Don't be afraid of telling her how much you like it. Tell her how pretty she is when you punish her too. Make it graphic. She makes you do it. It is her fault you know.   
I don't even know if I can post the links to the torrents, but...if you navigate to [Tokyo Tosho](http://www.tokyotosho.info) and then type "gurren lagann movie bss" you might have a chance of discovering just what it is you're looking for.
When you turn the bottle "upside down" so the end is facing down, the contents don't spill out so if it's not a clear bottle, you would think it is empty.
Ooh ooh, do me!
I wonder if poking pixels to an image buffer is slower or faster than moveto/lineto and caching the last color value.  You might benefit from the context's drawing operations by reducing the number of calls.
so what did he hit at the intersection? Actually, only shows how dumbed down the cops are; I'm surprised he didn't think of 'turning the car off'; or maybe he thought he would break the car by doing so.
&gt; And most guys that I know aren't into barbie doll women with super huge tits and hours of makeup.  You can say that again. I prefer a much more amateurish, next-door girl that turns me on for some reason, like some trait reminding me of some girl I know IRL or some face that screams "I love raunchy sex", and *all* of my friends are the same. In fact I suspect that the high-budget porn industry is sometimes clueless about people's tastes and keep making classic porn while smaller sites with focus on specific fetishes or amateurish gals are collecting the money.
You can watch all 5 seasons for free on Hulu (or various other places).  I only *just* started watching it this year. I ignored it the entire time it was on, because the early advertising made it seem like a different show.  Then, when I would occasionally see part of an episode while channel surfing, I had no idea what was going on.  Then one day, I randomly decided to give it a chance and started watching it from the beginning and I was completely hooked. I watched all 5 seasons over the course of a few days, pretty much non-stop.   You have to watch it from the beginning, and it really rewards you for paying attention. Also it helps a lot if you get all the references, homages, and in-jokes they throw in.
Cyborgs can love too. 
Upvoted for "Holy Shit HOLY SHIT ok, it was noth- HOLY SHIT"
Good god, really? You fucking bitch. 
I think you are describing an AGW believer. OK, they just got the conclusion wrong, the research is fine.
I lived in the south, and found it to be vastly similar, just hotter and with drawls. I was kinda amazed at how much hype there was to things southern vs the actual differences.   &gt;but what is so ignorant about wanting to learn about cultural norms  Asking about the norms and culture of Nashville would be one thing, but the south isn't some unified block of culture like it's 1865. Louisana is gonna be different from Atlanta which is different from Wilmington NC which is different from West Virginia, etc....   &gt;The fact there is an NHL team is not some unifying cultural force for me, man.  I question how much of a total southern backwater any place with an NHL team could be. It seems to me most metropolitan areas are gonna be similar to one another. 
Imgur cache: http://imgur.com/Zg8uL
high five!  o/
I live in Virginia and this was taken today.
such a stupid submission title
All enlisted careers pay equally in the navy, but at least with a CT rate you generally have a much higher chance of getting promoted and with CTI you get CTI third class right out of A school, so you're getting e-4 pay  then. There are some hefty re-enlistment bonuses, though. My friend who just re-enlisted as a CTN picked up a $75,000 re-enlistment bonus.
Ah, I love Louis CK   But he isn't the first thing I think of when someone mentions cumming ants.
Shall we really compare an adventurist American asking for trouble in Palestine with an Iranian native protesting in and on the behalf of her own country? Really?
I'm getting paid tomorrow.  I can eat ramen for a month no sweat.
I know its nothing great but after my [request for a logo](http://www.reddit.com/r/logo/comments/aw22w/rkiteboarding_would_love_you_for_a_logo/) got banned (why?) I was desperate enough to try making a logo myself.
[Super Monkey Collider Loses Funding](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/30420)  "... Scientists insist the collider is an important step toward understanding the universe, because no one can yet say for certain what kind of noises monkeys would make if collided at those high speeds."
Who are the cool patrons, and what do they do to earn your respect/friendship? Who are the douchebags that you freakin hate, and why?
PARDON ME SIR, I AM OFFENDED.
What advice can anyone give on taking down enemy helicopters (not UAVs)? The only thing that seems to work for me is get on a heavy MG and unload in their direction until I hopefully hit them enough to take them out.
It was revolutionary 6 years ago, when the most popular 3d mmo was Everquest.  Now, the leveling seems like a grind because everyone has their character maxed out. 
Can I take a picture of the public road outside your house? From your bedroom?
learn how to spell atheist.
There is that: Glenfiddich is good for when you're past the point of appreciation. Though, at that point, I normally stop. *shrugs*  I've yet to have the Belvenie Doublewood--we have a taster of it in the cupboard, though. It will probably happen later this week.  Drink some water! Dehydration hang-overs are the worst!
Best part is easily "as long as the weapon is totally slick like a huge-ass machine gun"
All research I was shown in school said that they did things like lay flowers on the graves of their dead, wore makeup (that was a recent news story), they did cave paintings first, and from what I've read our ancestors were much more violent and probably doomed the neandertals. 
I like #1 a lot.  #5 could have been improved by moving the downspout off center I think.
You said:  &gt; The Chinese fought back when MacArthur's troops were closing in on the Chinese borders [...] MacArthur wanted to pick a fight with China because he thought America could handle it.  So you weren't referring to the early stages of the war when you said that MacArthur was picking a fight with China.  At that point, the US had shit well in hand their "defeat" was far from "assured".
I actually refrain from commenting a lot because I'm terrified everyone will think I'm stupid. Thanks for the advice! 
Close but no cookie. Judging by the downvotes, a lot of men just felt fear.
Thank god he collected these.  My favorite was about R2D2..."Did R2D2 get put back together?"
why does it matter that its being proposed by the conservative party? oh I see, business interests.
I want whatever this guy is taking. Not only was he hyperbolic, but his claims were wrong on a basic level. Every challenge Mass Effect 2 has made to gaming conventions has been made before, especially by Bioware.   Modern game journalists are funny this way. They see a refined concept that is still uncommon in the industry and praise it as some sort of baffling revolutionary idea. This reminds me of the post-release press of Bioshock.
Start a new project. Clean your basement, or organize photos into albums. Find something that will keep your mind and body preoccupied.
Why are you called the "gingeraptor"? Are you a ginger or do you eat gingers?
Thanks for taking the time to explain your position. It's refreshing to debate an issue without having the opposing side resort to name-calling (which seems to happen an awful lot on Reddit).  &gt;The reason why equating this to taxation is absurd is because this is a small group of people, not the vast majority of our society. Having your property taken by a small group of people because they feel like it isn't the same as having your property taken by the government on a regular basis because you've agreed to it.  Another way of saying that is, "Having your property taken by a small group of people isn't the same as having your property taken by a large group of people." Your argument boils down to this, if the majority of a small group of people want to take your possessions by force and give them to the poor it is wrong. But if the majority of a large group of people want to take your possessions by force and give them to the poor, it is ok.   It's really a matter of semantics. What constitutes a "large" group? If the majority of the people in your town voted to take your possessions would that be enough? Or the majority of the people in your county? Or your state? You see, when you start to sacrifice individual rights to majority rule things tend to get murky.   &gt;...having your property taken by the government on a regular basis because you've agreed to it.  I've agreed to no such thing. Like tens of millions of other Americans, I give them my money because if I don't they will send men with guns to my home to lock me up.   &gt;Why must you use the force of government to accomplish your goals? If the majority of people really support your goals as you contend, why not just do it on a voluntary basis? &gt;&gt;Because that doesn't work. If it did, we wouldn't have to tax people for social programs in the first place because there would be no need.  Ask yourself why it doesn't work on a voluntary basis. If the majority of people want to support government social programs for the poor (as you contend), there would be massive voluntary support of such a system. If on the other hand the majority of people really don't want to support government social programs (as evidenced by your admission that it wouldn't work on a voluntary basis), then how do you justify taking their money by force (that would mean a minority of people forcing the majority to do something against their will)? Do you see how you've painted yourself into a corner there? If it's really the will of the majority then it shouldn't take force to accomplish it.  When you're thinking about these issues, please remember that libertarians aren't against helping poor or disadvantaged people (that would be more of an Objectivist position). We just feel that private charity is more moral (i.e. it doesn't take people's money by force) and more efficient than social programs mandated by the state. 
You don't take pictures and post it on facebook.  That is beyond coping. 
He just dropped out of ludicrous speed.
Well, there are examples where gates can ... gate ... to each other in close proximity, from SG-1 and Atlantis.  As an example, using the SGC gate to dig a hole in the ice-bound gate in Antarctica by adjusting coordinates or something.  Or any number of instances when the Goauld attack planets and dial gates.  Or when SG-1 is on Apohus' ship and they gate to Earth.  I don't think it's a plot hole, it probably just assumes the calculation/modification/adjustment/override is done by the ship.
?  If you engine brake down a steep gradient, your engine *will* be racing.  That's the point.  *I* get freaked out if I'm going down a steep gradient and my engine *isn't* racing, because I worry I'll kill my brakes and then accelerate uncontrollably until I die.
Like that episode of Friends when Joey and Chandler guess the objects in Rachel's shopping bag
Pot pies are notorious tongue burners.
Once you realize what a joke everything is, being the Comedian is the only thing that makes sense.  Conservatives, for whatever reason, are unaware of the joke.
I almost dropped my laptop turning it upside down. 
Some of these designers are not so fluent in English, but I guess as long as they can get their message across it's ok!  :)
Haha, I have to throw one more SebastiAn remix in here.  [His remix of Human After All](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gnhiAmDBWmw) is much better than the original.
Obama?
Damn.. So I wasn't the only one who fell for that. An upvote to celebrate our shared trauma.
cario dock +compiz = The greatest OS UI EVER now if only i didn't have to type wine "app" in terminal every time i wanted to run something that was worth my time.
Who's there?
It's not a DSLR, it's a Canon SX20IS.  The lens listed is: 5-100mm f/2.8-5.7 (35mm film equivalent: 28-560mm)  Not sure what crop factor is, sorry.  Fairly new to having a larger camera.
I'm obviously biased, but I am annoyed that Amazon used the word "monopoly" when referring to Macmillan's own products -- can't say I agree with the usage of the term. They're also making the best use possible of consumer outrage by saying that their decisions were based purely upon pricing, which isn't true. 
I don't have any particular *requirement* per say that it has to be a WP plugin. I'm a bit of a beginner, WP was just easy to get up and running and I figured there'd be a plugin already existant. I just need a simple solution that I can add to what I've got that will let each person log in to see their balance and then pay it.
Could be, but there is also seems to be a strong negative correlation between IQ and religion.
What school?
As long as you're walking on a slab of plastic/rubber/whatever, you're not *really* using your feet. You'll see when you've gone barefoot for a few days straight. It hurts at first. You have to learn to walk differently. Once you get used to being barefoot/barely-barefoot, regular shoes are a hazard. It's hard to drive because you can't feel the pedal and make little adjustments with just your toes, it's hard to walk down stairs because you can't feel the edge of the steps, and it's especially hard to run because you can't feel the ground and you can't flex the way you want to.
Mine too. 
i find your comment personally offensive. 
"Wilson!!!!!!!!"
that whole movie just creeps me out...to this day I don't think I would be comfortable watching it. 
This is why I should read before I post. Ditto
It depends.  If the other dimension were another world or something, it would lose the pleasure.  But if it were just an empty space they're trapped in, unique to the person's belly, then it would be just as good.  That way the prey's still technically theirs, and while it would be missnig the whole belly aspect of it, being kept alive in a place unique to the pred makes up for it.
McDonald's introduces new character: Junkie McShakes
The following are the English language trailers- hope you don't mind.  [Renaissance](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OGs3eXvob3Q): Very cool sci-fi flick with insane visuals.  [Le pacte des loups](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=D7DTv2uBA7I): Great action-adventure story set in the 18th century- allegedly inspired by true events, but incredibly cool regardless.  [Quills](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u--PYnIYewE): Technically an American film, but it's about the Marquis de Sade- and you will *not* regret giving it a chance.  This isn't out yet, but also looks awesome: [Solomon Kane](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XSDZNHYLDOY)
http://imgur.com/hXuBq  mine is boring and the automatic save location for my firefox browser, so junk gets dumped there
The first laugh is reasonable as you're immediately presented with an absurd scenario. The laugh at the Excellence line was bizarre. The Pelosi line got a laugh out of me. Coulter's last line was an attempt at self-depreciating humour, but the delivery was a bit off.
I love Amelie, also the film Wasabi, The Closet and I believe its called Gold digger.   The Closets hilarious, I really recommend that one.
Pull an Amelie
As is the matriarchy, then. Fight the matriarchy! All women are the enemy!
There IS a dispensary in Ypsilanti, sort of.  They have a building from which they give patients MMJ.  They have 100 patients and are not accepting more.  I believe it is really just a group of caregivers all using the same building.  But they can't even handle the volume for 100 patients, let alone what a real dispensary would have to handle.  They ran out less than a month after 'opening.'  The MMMCC has been acting shady, and basically people who are pro MMJ in Michigan are staying away from them.  They are reaching too far too quickly, and someone is going to get punished.  
Also, either MSU or LUC (Loyola Chicago) at this point.
I like, where did you get the big time/date weather thing?  And where'd you get the background?  And cowboybebop and carl sagon's cosmos.  You know what, just give me a copy of your harddrive.
&gt; The difference was that they were slightly better at economics but would've probably have fallen into a similar trap  [http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Black\_Wednesday](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Black_Wednesday)
Want a balloon?
I'd recommend you start with some life drawing. Just focus of small vignettes first - ankles, ears, noses, the arc of a back etc. If you can get comfortable with life drawing, the technical stuff will be easy to learn after. The other way round is much harder.
you had to use a calculator?
Wait I missed the part in the article where there was any proof Israel did it.
I'd like one as well.
You haven't lived until you've eaten the spicy spotted owl rolls while driving in an original hummer sporting four giant american flags at 95 miles an hour through a school zone while thowing the styrofoam containers out the window and singing god bless america at the top of your lungs. Please pardon the run-on.
Nero Search? And do you really need such a freaking huge desktop search box?
My friends nominated me as the choosen one who could leap this hurdle.   But not yet.
Amaro Goncalves, a vice-president of sales at Smith &amp; Wesson, to be precise.
I...I'm gonna go sit in a dark room and have a long think.
Ah... Mrs Reynolds I lust you so.
That was funny but not prescient. It was published on the day the iPad was announced.
NO!
Doesn't she know her place in Britain? 
&gt; &lt;RobertFischer&gt; I’m doing a podcast and writing a blog. ... and don't forget to check out my flickr album about B-trees.
http://i.imgur.com/ZpuAx.jpg  Sky Wallpaper
George is getting upset, here!
tl;dr translation: - Political parties - Same shit, different bucket.
They just [backed down...](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/02/01/technology/companies/01amazonweb.html?hp)
"Independent-minded cat shits outside the box"
agreed with you lolerside that above advice is baaad - seriously if my dude did that to me I'd get that piece of clothing and whip him with it I'm female, my weight fluctuates - this time last year i was a size 6, right now i'm closer to a large 8 or size 10 (in america i think that's like going from size 0 - 4 maybe). Despite the fact that I still fall into what is mostly acceptable in the way of looks and size I still feel like the fattest heffer on the face of the planet. I feel morbidly fucking obese right now and my bf decided to start telling me to lose weight sure I would - but it probably wouldn't be in a healthy way and it would create all kinds of issues between us.  Bottom line - we are VERY fucking aware when we have put on weight, seriously - I know if i've put on a kilo. We don't need our bfs or gfs (if that's how you roll) telling us when we fucking do. First how do you look? Could you stand to lose a few? Could you tone up and look a touch more like one of those... i don't know 'buff' types? How would you feel if your girl came home one night and said "oh btw to be honest, not really finding you THAT attractive right now, think you could do something about muscling up for me?" better idea - why not start eating healthier and working out yourself, she will most likely follow suit - it might take a few weeks but trust me she will. My bf thankfully is still pudgier than I and he recently started working out and eating healthier, it's been influencing me to eat healthier and work out a little more instead of starving myself to lose weight.  TL; DR - Duuude - waaaaaay fucking uncool, no fucking way - do not do that. Instead try leading by example and eating better/working out, she will end up doing the same.
Not that I disagree about PCSOs, but it sounds to me like she was unnecessarily roughed up by a 'real officer' who arrived on the scene. Of course that wouldn't have happened if that PCSO douchebag wasn't such a POS.
&gt;Are children allowed at the resort?  Yes.  There were usually a few kids here and there.  It was a great place for them because there were so many pools, and the innocence that comes with being a child.  We had over 500 year round residents in the houses on campus, so a lot of them had kids. &gt;Are single men allowed to join?  Yes, and No.  There were background checks to get membership.  We sold day passes and single men were not allowed to get day passes.  They could get membership.  If you had a woman with you you could get in for the day.  &gt;When you saw fat old people naked, how many times did it take you to get over it and see them as nice and normal?  I would just keep eye contact, and it wasn't so bad.  I think I got used to the idea of everyone being naked pretty quickly.  When everyone is naked I actually felt strange wearing clothes, like I was the one doing something taboo. &gt;What was the quotient of show-off, exhibitionist types vs regular people just wanting be naked?  I will assume you mean ratio?  There were a lot of exhibitionists there.  I would say the majority of 'normal' nudists would only stay around the resort area for the sun hours as people really started drinking at night.  Some of the more strict naturalists never even came to the resort they just lived there because they could have the lifestyle they wanted.  
I'll be honest, I'm fairly disappointed after previewing all the tracks.
Haha had to look up what docky was, but no it's just 7 Ultimate 64 with the taskbar on auto-hide. I upgraded about a week ago (from XP32) when I did my reformat and I love it.  
Its kind of funny, in a scary way, that starting a new country to avoid government abuse simply results in the country getting run by business instead of government and continuing to abuse you via that avenue instead. This must be what it feels like to be the RIAA trying to take down the piratebay.
As did I, immediately before posting it.
Wouldn't it be pretty easy to make one yourself?   1 x old book of adequate size. 1 x elastic strip of adequate length. 1 x Stapler of adequacy. 1 x adequate box o staples. 1 x adequate glue. 1 x scissors to adequately cut.  Mix together.  Fin.
The writers have said they're not gonna end it with something like that.
&gt;That tells you something.  That tells you advertising works.
Awesome. I've been wanting to get God of War: Collection... I just don't want to spend the money :(. I just bought Left 4 Dead 2 and I've been running out of time to actually finish games.
Cool fact: "Nah" is "No" in Farsi 
If you're on Xbox, start using the second disc. Some of the conversations don't seem to happen on the first one. 
Let's foster a debate -- if you disagree, don't just downvote me -- make your case!
Someone tell this kid about the hidden zoom.
Sputtering nonsense?  I'd say so.  Nothing like taking your experience and generalizing that experience to EVERYONE!  Statistically half of married men have this happen to them, eh?  Last time I checked, pulling statistics out of your ass renders said statistics dubious and invalid.  
&gt; as casual as it gets.  If you think Halo is as casual as games get  then make sure you are wearing divers boots and they are strapped on tight as I am about to blow you away and knock your socks off.  I present to you a game thousands of times more casual than Halo ever will be  [Peggle](http://www.popcap.com/games/peggle)  ---  Seriously though, didn't you pay any attention to what I said with the difference between mainstream and casual games?
Why do you pay idiots like [this guy](http://www.politicallore.com/writers/alexander-nobles/global-warming-in-maine/1551) to write for you?
Two kids on one sled IS lighter than two kids on two sleds!
It was just meatspin, but smaller and fewer frames. I lost my local copy of shock_sprays.rar and don't remember where I got it.
I've always been amazed by that as well. On very, very, rare occasions I'll download a TS of a movie if it's mostly for background noise while doing something else. For me, it's often more the audio in a normal cam that's annoying. I can tolerate a fuzzy picture, but it's the dialog I go to a movie for. 
I use this one. http://twincitiestech.com/services/wp-invoice/
Read. I can't concentrate if people are talking. 
Didn't watch it.  The guest list put me right off.  I don't need to spend any part of my life listening to Linda Martin or Twink.
Pot and the skill to smoke it.
Oh this is good. Thanks!
A larger heatsink and a faster fan do however produce better results than smaller ones. They are also more reliable.
Came here to post this (babies are stupid).  That had me laughing for days.
&gt; Nothing favors wealth, not work, more neatly than the tax break on capital gains. President Clinton lowered the tax on long-term gains to 20 percent. President Bush cut it again, to 15 percent, little more than half the rate paid by middle-class Americans on their wages. Bush's action pushed the rate to a 70-year low; it's now at 77 years and counting, going back to 1933.  Middle class people must not own stocks or bonds I guess.   Low capital gains tax favors capital accumulation leading to expansion of the capital stock, more capital per worker, and therefore more output per worker. Author disregards the fact that both capital and labor are components of a production function and we have to assign some value to the use of capital just as we assign value to labor through wages.   &gt; Only a trace amount of all the churning on Wall Street grows anything. Small companies with big dreams raise seed money through initial public offerings (IPOs) and secondary offerings. These investments deserve a bigger tax break than they get now; there's a strong case for making them tax-free. All other stock market gains should be taxed the same as wages (which they were, back when).  The fact that there are IPOs, secondary offerings, and repeated debt offerings are contingent on an actual secondary market existing for the stuff. You dry up demand on the secondary market through hiking capital gains tax and you can expect that its going to have a negative effect on the health of the primary market.   This is an aside from the fact that there is considerable risk putting your own money up to own shares of a given stock or purchase a bond. There seems to be a perception that these assets only appreciate when they don't (often for years at a time or never).   &gt; Tax breaks on Wall Street gains (except as noted) fail three fiscal policy tests. They serve no purpose. They're a limitless drain on the Treasury. And they're inequitable: they favor wealth, not work. Income is income, and should be taxed the same no matter where it comes from.  I can agree that tax breaks on wall street serve no purpose in the long run. However, the notion that a low capital gains tax is implicitly a "break" for wall street is an utter joke. Capital gains taxes are going to affect most people with an actual rate of savings, and more broadly, the future job market.
They have a weight problem, and a personality disorder yes, but not a point.
It's winter here...no house flies
Nah, scratch the Japanese food. Stay at home. Eat your own poo.
Haha. Well your first example actually would, in my opinion be rational if the nudity in that theoretical movie was a purely sexual image.
Props to the man.  But considering who it is, and why...? =(
Make it about you. Say something like, "I feel shitty because I never get any exercise/eat too much. My body just feels sluggish and lazy, and I'm sick of it. I need to get out and do something about it. Do you know what I mean?" At that point, she may say that she feels the same way, and then you can suggest doing something together about it, diet/exercise, whatever. If she doesn't, then ask if she'll join you in order to give you some motivation.
http://dl.dropbox.com/u/57649/pics/miscellaneous%20pics/desktopcube5.png
And thus racism was over; there was much rejoicing.
a whole gigabyte of mango diesel?!   i am absolutely jealous! 
And perhaps chosen a different user name for this AMA.
You're giving people more credit than they deserve.
I grew tired of it when I was in the mines after the wolf part. Where there's an explosives room and such. There were just a bunch of lame slow puzzles and not enough scariness. Motivate me to keep playing? Does it get scarier?
It all depends really, if you enjoy PC gaming more than Xbox gaming then go with the PC and vice versa.  If you don't have any friends who play on the PC, then join a clan and get friends that way, (although they aren't friends you can talk to face to face).  
Wrong. He is Nobel Laureate who know what's he's talking about. He's a great man and scholar. Stop beating off to Glenn Beck.
That's awesome. The original Harvest Moon was fun, but I'm not a big fan of the time-limited games in the series, which is partly why Friends of Mineral Town is my favourite.
Student Loan Debt! Aaargh!
My dad and I were trout fishing off a dock when he puts his pole down to do something and it instantly gets a huge bite and shoots off into the lake.  The next day we rent a row boat and setup not far from the dock.  The very first time I drop my line I pull up my dads fishing pole.  He still uses it to this day.
Maybe so I don't feel like a cheep floozy?
Snakebite. Basically just a combination of lager beer, apple cider and blackcurrant squash.
Vietnam nightmares!
Huh... I don't remember that bit. Was it after he got hypnotized by the skull, or before he climbed into the fridge?  (I kid, I kid)
I think Apple will allow background processes once they've figured out how to do it without ever exposing the concept of task management to the user.
&gt;free accesses to the gooddamn intertubes! wikipedia in book form! ("don't panic")  that's the absolute last thing i want while i'm trying to read a book
wow that's really cool - i wish my state (new mexico) had a bronze pin program. checkout the mepp's master angler program if you haven't already; word is, you get free lures after your 4th qualifying catch (i'm at 3).
They were still given the shells by their government. This is only a token gesture on Israel's part. 
I think that the point is to contrast with many American conservatives who don't even see the point of the government pushing higher broadband speeds.
That's quite possible. I was basically thinking of my Dad, who's bipolar and when he was committed he had definitely been having some real psychotic episodes. I don't know what medication he was on in the hospital (Lithium now - which has been an absolute godsend, it just works). There were other people on his ward doing that walk too.
I Got What America Needs Right Here  http://www.theonion.com/content/opinion/i_got_what_america_needs_right
Oh...  [Speechlessness]
COuple problems with your thinking.  Displacement is not the same as a cessation of existence.  If you move from point A to A', then you have *displaced* but not ceased to exist.  This is made plain by the fact that your body can still be measured. Further, I believe your perspective on movement is inconsistent with relativity.  A key part of relativity is that there is no preferred reference frame.  As such, it is impossible to have any absolute speeds - only relative.  NB: I wish to remind that quantum mechanics is not applicable to humans.  It stops working on scales about that of the atom.
That's crazy! Did anyone else instantly think about blueray porn streaming? 
Thank you so much for this info!
Yep, reason and love are all they conserve. The country isn't talking to them anymore but they haven't noticed yet.
I tried making this chart recently but all the data was in jpg's and i didn't want to manually input it.  kudos to you for making the effort though.  
This is why I hate puppets. I didn't think of him as a doll but a puppet.. and now I can't go to comedy shows with puppets included because they scare the shit out of me.
 2lsair forum حياة القلوب
Uh, that's not cream. Oreos are on [this list](http://www.peta.org/accidentallyVegan/VeganShoppingQS-Snacks.asp?Category=Snacks) of vegan junk food.
That's a [Citizen's for Progressive Transit map](http://www.cfpt.org/), essentially, an Atlanta Liberal Transit Thinktank's wet dream. It ain't ever gonna happen. Which doesn't mean I don't want it to happen.
"Well we wouldn't want you to fell left out now would we? Why do you have something against socializing? I thought that's what we were here to do"
wow, i'm sooooo happy to hear this :) 
Who would have guessed that reddit is overrun by smug pricks?
Why don't you just associate the file types with wine?
Because he's a professor he must be right! He paid for a fancy piece of paper!
The fan had stopped dead at the point I had to oil it. It was either that or replace the fan. It's now working better than it has in months.
The keys ended up in a pile of dirt decades old. I couldn't see it through the crack with a flashlight and I wasn't sure if the workers would be willing to deal with the horrible front desk people. I probably offered a beer or something but I never heard back from the elevator guys. 
Yogurt, pesto and mackerel? FUCK YEAH.
I don't know what is in my area. I kind of stay inside unless I absolutely need to go out. Or if my friends come over.   And I didn't know there were legal definitions of that. Part of the problem I have with him not keeping the hallway warm enough is that I think the heat in my apartment then goes up into the empty apartment above me (which is empty and he tries to heat the same as down here) and the halls... I can actually feel air coming in through the bottom of my door, so I know it's going out.   I tried going to disability services (I am autistic) but they were very rude to me so I haven't been back. I really don't want to either. I have thought about using my school health insurance, which I have paid for for over a year. but that involves driving in an odd town and going into odd buildings. Both I am bad at. :( Apparently we get all these services with it, but I don't use it.
I get one hair on my face that grows away from the normal beard area. I find it annoying far beyond the minuscule effort of shaving it. 
I'm happy he was able to be someone's white knight.
Same thing I've done. I've had to use bandaids though. Sometimes they bleed, but not much more paint than plucking a hair.
I can safely say that this scene scared me more than any scene in any movie ever has.  The sensation was of being actually paralyzed and having difficulty breathing while ice water was being poured on my neck, down my back. EDIT: I did not and will not click the link.  
Good explanation, and it only leaves out the inflationary effect.  To explain that, you have to talk about who benefits from the minimum wage.  Unions have negotiated for contracts which will automatically increase pay rates based on minimum wage.  People may be making 10%, 100% or 500% over minimum wage.  So, when the minimum wages goes up, a lot of people's pay rates go up proportionately, causing employers to raise prices.  Competitive forces will cause general prices to rise.  Then the question arises who is hurt by inflation?  People living on fixed incomes.
Considering that nearly everyone of the downvotes go against the very rules of this site I think I have reason to bitch.  When the *intelligent* masses of reddit decide to act like young earth creationists I rather enjoy pointing it out.
http://i.imgur.com/xyH3n.png
My turn... [http://imgur.com/9jAeh.jpg](http://imgur.com/9jAeh.jpg)
Ggggrrrrrroooocerries!
Whereas I watched that movie on repeat for the first five years of my life. My family eventually threw it away.
I check out the [Chicago Tribune](http://www.chicagotribune.com) and other local newseries. I also, from time to time, check in on the sports world at si.com.  But really, i'm on reddit 85-90% of the time i'm intermudging. 
CSS has the same guns and maps but it plays a lot differently.  Some key differences off the top of my head: * More random spread patterns when going full auto.  In 1.6, bullets go above the corsshair as you spray.  In CSS, they spread out more randomly. * Larger hit boxes. * Slower walking speed, doesn't allow you to move as quickly without making any noise. Basically, CSS is more random and more friendly to novice players.  Valve has been continuing this trend for a long time.  1.6 had bigger hit boxes than 1.5 and added equipment like the tactical shield.  Then there was a patch for 1.6 released in late 2003 or early 2004 that made the recoil for M4 and AK more random and added AWP scope delay.  You used to be able to quick switch with the AWP and bring up the scope immediately.  Those were the days...
Dude, PDF *kills* firefox. 
Flash has a 98% install base.  Apple doesn't create anything that comes close to that.  If you buy into Apple's products or ecosystem - that is a choice - that ecosystem is obviously self contained.  If you want to use the modern web, Flash is all but unavoidable regardless of what hardware/software platform you choose.  And so far, Flash's potential performance even on participating mobile platforms is still very questionable.  But for the record, I see Windows users complaining about iTunes all the time.  I know I certainly avoid iTunes on Windows. 
Mine was  **treble clef**: 'Every Good Boy Deserves Fudge' for the lines and 'FACE' for the spaces  **bass clef**: 'Good Boys Don't Fool Around for the lines and 'All Cows Eat Grass' for the spaces
[Explained here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indoctrination)
There's one in NYC (maybe Brooklyn) as well, based on the Korean model. It's apparently really successful.  edit: [This one](http://www.nytimes.com/2008/05/11/fashion/11inspa.html?pagewanted=1&amp;_r=1)
 loop:   ldr  r3,  [r0], #4   tst  r3,  #1   add  r3,  r3,  r2,  lsl #1   strne   r3,  [r0, #-4]  func:   subs r1,  r1,  #1   bge  func   bx   lr
How did you cross the border? Which border was this, Mexico? I'm guessing you are from South America? Colombian?
jó volt bezony, még félig "külsősként" is :)
Well, on the one hand, 911 operators aren't trained to tell people how to deal with all sorts of emergencies.  They're trained to get the information needed to dispatch emergency assistance, and to in some cases tell people what to do for medical emergencies...  That being said, it's sad that there were likely three drivers in this scenario (the driver, his wife, and the 911 operator) and *none* of them came up with this idea.
Go back to school before you hurt someone with your inane arguments.
We would tell a manager if it seemed to be a problem.  erections weren't allowed so most people would just cover them up if they got one on accident.  I would never report someone if I thought it was an accident, but if they were being pervy we could get them kicked out. This one time there was an old old man who came into our restaurant with a huge boner, he must have had 2 or 3 blue helpers, and it was probably the only one he was getting that year.  Well, it seemed he was just trying to get away from the crowds and calm down, so I left him alone, but one of my friends got pissy about it and called the manager over who told him he had to cover it up.  The old man got really defensive and he shouted "My arm's hard do I have to cover that up too?" Hysterical.  
How would you know?  You didn't take that picture.
Only about 10%.
I totally agree with the cleaning part, plus I would never leave my soap the way the images suggest, not only will it spoil the soap, but also leave marks on the grill.
Whale.
watership down ! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_5I9izys2ek&amp;feature=fvst
its sortof like a "new world order" 
vuze? n00b! (just doing what the thread says)
Yeah, I really like the concept of e-ink, and I probably would buy one if I had the money, because I could download every book (without buying them of course) and carry them all with me.  But as long as I have my library card I don't need to get an e-reader or buy another book EVER, not only it's free but I can go online and reserve any book,movie,cd and pick it up at my local library.  And the best it's that is ABSOLUTELY FREE. You can't beat that.
I had no idea the Left elected this one cartoonist to speak for "them". 
what are you going to put in it? :D
Thanks.  That's what I figured.  I have ridden past the dirt track everyday for about 5 years on the way to work and thought about riding it.  On Saturday I rode the track.  It's long, but relatively flat making it fast enough to ride, for fun on the way to work.  I was told by the guy I'm buying the bike from that doing that everyday will kill the bike.  But I'm not sure about that.....
Because you comment was really far down on the page, so the version of it I, and the other people responding to it saw after reading the rest of the page was an incorrect comment with several upvotes.
Wow, an AA party in Utah sounds like about the most boring way to spend an evening. Especially if there's no caffeine allowed either.
It could actually be worse.
from my experience of nudist beaches and "clothing optional" resorts, I'd say that the vast majority of people who go naked should really be required to keep their clothes on. Most of them are 50+, fat, flabby and not exactly good looking. Eye bleach stations should be mandatory.  Your thoughts?
zombies would have a field day at that conference 
I wonder how many of us will have Steam on our desktops.
Hyperbole.  A philosophy cannot be responsible for anything.  Responsibility rests with the people that use/abuse it.
saw this movie when it came out, think I was about 12, because it had the Jurassic Park guy in it. Pissed my pants scared.  Alan Grant ... how you failed me ...
It is healthier for most people.  Unless you're working out often or not eating much, the leaner meats are healthier.   I already eat enough junk as it is, any fat I can do without is good.
*starts working on his Benny Hill extension*
Duh.   Everybody *knows* ya gotta be smart to go to college!
Was the pay difference between genders based solely on tips?
abandoned commie-russia facilities will never get old
"feel" =/= sloppy guitar playing
I can't be sure if the zeitgeist was more optimistic back then (I'm thinking John Major, I was a child for most of Thatchers years), or if I was just younger and more optimistic.   You raise good points and I agree, the Pink Floyd analogy works perfectly.
Agreed. 
The Guiness Book of World Records has only achieved to encourage people to do ridiculous, senseless, and stupid things. 
Wear a fake mustache and glasses when you're out hunting for cybersnatch??
I think this is an interesting and legitimate question and I would also like to see the laundry list, or the link, which shows that Obama is not governing from the middle. I mean, is everyone just supposed to take this on faith? Is it supposed to be self-evident?
Yes.
If I were in this position, I'm not sure whether I'd be able to avoid accidentally punching Geithner in the face with a right cross.
I think you need to differentiate between conservatives and Republican politicians. Many Republicans aren't actually conservatives, they are closer to what you've described.
The brave little toaster. 
The Greatest Presidential Stories Never Told: 100 Tales from History to Astonish, Bewilder, and Stupefy by Rick Beyer is full of short, entertaining stories, mostly about American presidents.
This is what my friends did with their cat and it worked amazing well:  If the cat bites or claws you, run to a different room and then wait.  If the cats on your lap, gently move it over and then run to a different room.  Eventually the cat will come over to you and act really timid and sorry. Apparently it's how cats play with each other.  If they get hurt, they run away.  That's how they know they are playing too rough.  If it bites you and you never run away, the cat thinks you're fine with the roughhousing.
Pretty easy. I mean, we can open and close doors. Dinosaurs aren't smart enough to do that... and they don't have thumbs. I can't think of one situation where a dinosaur has gotten through a closed door.
Since there are only 4, I'll just explain them, as each of them is very different:  The University Youth Shelter: This one is the random church basement night one, but each church is assigned a night. Most of the nights haven't changed in the 10 years I've been around, so most kids have them memorized. At this one, your name is not run, but I still feel like it's counterproductive as it doesn't feel stable.. there are no showers. Each night you show up, and they have these two inch pads, a sheet, a hospital blanket and a pillow. You take one of each, and pick out a spot on the floor. I think Saturday nights has a few cots too. When I first started getting off the streets I came here a lot, as it was the easiest transition off of the streets. Most nights are 16 or so to 24 I think, but some nights were only 14-18 too back then. I'm just including seattle youth ministries in this as they were almost identical, they just do the under 18 nights and have showers. They had a room though put aside, instead of a basement.. so they have a drop in too during the day. Here's a pic of sym: http://www.streetyouthministries.org/images/SYM-About.jpg Kinda quaint, up on 47th and 15th.  Denny Place: This was the only one downtown. You had to have a clean record to stay here, and they accepted kids 16 and over. They made you take a shower and wash your clothes when you stayed here, which was absolutely unacceptable to me. I just hated wasting every night doing that, so I never stayed here. They had two rooms, one for girls and one for boys with 8 beds in each, but now they just serve boys. This was the closest shelter to how I imagined them. On one wall there was a giant closet, and it was filled with donation clothes. You could just take whatever you wanted. I found one of my favorite button up shirts there as a kid, and near the door they had a bookshelf you could just take books from. That's where I discovered lord of the rings. Most shelters were more choosey about where they gave the donations.  Youthcare: I stayed here the longest, about 3 months. They are out in the U village. It's a very sterile place, they also run a lot of transitional houses though, and they kept me housed for years. I had to jump through a lot of stupid hoops, but they really helped me out the most. At that place, you would get buzzed in by a camera and usually have to explain who you were to it. Then you would go up a bunch of really sterile smelling stairs, and there was this big front room type area with a kitchen. There was also an office, with tons of windows so they could see everything. Then the rooms were in hallways off to the side. Almost everyone got their own room, but some people shared them. All the furniture was connected to the walls. Here's a pic of one of the dining room of one of the houses I stayed at for years, ISIS: http://www.youthcare.org/images/uploads/table_setting.jpg They just always have this sterile look. This place was also 14-18, but you had to have a clean record.. I convinced my mom to clear it so I could stay here. They did make me shower twice a week to stay here, it was a big deal to them.  Teen Hope: This place was up in Shoreline, by Costco. It was in a house, and they tried to make it homely.. almost too much. I stopped staying here because the family type dinners every night freaked me out. They had a normal front room, couch.. you would never guess it was a shelter if you just walked in. There were three bed rooms, each with three beds.. most of them had one bunch bed and one normal bed. It just sorta depended on which sex they had more of.. it changed around a lot if there were more girls or guys. This place was 14-18, but didn't like my run away report. I also got annoyed at how often they told me I would be raped on the streets.
Alien gave me nightmares for months when I was eight.  I'll watch it now and think [Sigourney Weaver](http://www.refinery29.com/pipeline/img/sigourney-weaver-alien-underwear.jpg) was fucking hot.
I don´t have a link but look up skyr cheese cake. Skyr is an Icelandic milk product that is quite different. I am sure you can get it online along with a recipe. And it makes for a fantastic cheese cake.
Porn is useful to fill the void created by differences in sex drives. However, as imabrickhouse said, some/most? people want to enjoy both single player and multiplayer action, just like they don't always have their favourite dish for lunch.
I don't find that very impressive as a guitar player, I've never even considering playing it any other way.
Which drug(s) were you associated with?  What is your country of origin? (I don't really expect an answer on that, but what the hell....)
[Gin Bucket!! Don't forget the ice!](http://imgur.com/vLLBN)
You know what? This article is spot on, I hate getting attacked during a sexual act
FUCK NO  It's cold outside!  Hell, it's cold INSIDE
&gt; What I'd be scared of though, is people starting to blindly embrace atheism, just like they did with classic religions, and shoving it down other people's throats.  Ya, annoying people suck.  What does blindly embrace atheism mean? Not having a belief in gods (which have no evidence) for no reason?  &gt; Religion is not the problem, it's the shared belief in something what causes turmoil.  That is just stupid. Beliefs do not causes turmoil. How people allow their beliefs to influence their behavior is what leads to turmoil. Religion is an influencing factor in how people behave but not the only one. Beliefs don't kill people, idiots with beliefs kill people.  &gt; The average man will try to find in atheism the same kind of reassurance others find in conventional faiths. And that will inevitably lead to hate, radicalization and intolerance.  What reassurances are obtained from not having a belief in any gods and how do those reassurances lead to hate, radicalizations and intolerance?  What are we suposed to discuss here? This is such a vague post that makes a lot of assumptions without backing anything up.
Sure, when it comes to [anti-Jewish](http://www.haaretz.com/hasen/spages/1045351.html) groups, or ones that look to [kill the Bolivian president](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/technology/facebook/4368582/Facebook-removes-group-seeking-to-hire-Bolivian-hitman.html), or ones that [celebrate Bosnian killings](http://www.javno.com/en-world/facebook-removes-group-celebrating-bosnia-killings_215025), or groups that support the [KKK](http://www.switched.com/2009/05/05/facebook-takes-the-kkks-baby-away/). These are typically groups that support and promote violence or extreme racism, which has always been the procedure. Facebook also publicly acknowledge the removal and answer free speech issues when asked.  There are *plenty* of anti-government groups and anti-organization groups out there, it seems odd to target just a couple (and not even the important ones at that) but ignore the rest, and then pretend it didn't happen despite the *ridiculously* high chance of bad PR, not to mention shattering their public image. Sorry-- until someone comes up with some actual proof that there's foul play I'm going to chalk this up to paranoia. 
Dragon Age is awesome, as for upcoming games Starcraft II, Bad Company 2, and Crysis 2 are all good games coming out right now.
actually al qaeda translates to "the base" aka "the database" of cia islamic extremist assets.  
Odd living room in the back.
I can't say I understand insomnia. The notion on being unable to sleep seems so foreign. Do you feel tired the next day?
Lost  starts Tuesday this week actually
It appears to be 60,000,000,000 nanoseconds.
tee hee
Which I find to be bullshit, because conservatives would have shut them down long ago.  The only reason they can broadcast at all is because of liberals.
Big time/date is Rainmeter with some very basic configuration. The theme is Dark_Rainmeter.  [Wallpaper is here](http://imgur.com/rDV47.jpg). It probably came from /wg/ or [wallbase](http://wallbase.net).
Common sense. I've not used an antivirus for at least 10 years. I have never got a virus. Stop downloading free smilies and using autorun and you will be ok.
If you are sniper, you are kind of supposed to camp. MW2 camping involves sitting in a random location with an assault rifle/SMG waiting for some people to come to you so you can kill them. In BC2 if someone is camping to much, you can literally just blow the building/area up around them thus removing their hiding spot
I assume the 360 version is similar enough to the pc version. Once you hit fire, you have about 5 seconds to put your crosshairs on your target before the missiles hit. The missiles aren't actually shooting out of the UAV chopper, they're coming in from somewhere else, which is why there is a delay between hitting fire and hitting the target.  [this video might help](http://www.gametrailers.com/user-movie/bad-company-2-uav-gameplay/335151)
Why were you going around a curve at 120mph?
They sent me the copy that they used. It is in my kitchen, it is what it is.
Baby food in aisle 1 and caskets in aisle 99.
Didn't expect an apology.  Thank you.  Usually when someone bitches about a pdf file, the poster tells 'em to get a better browser or pdf reader.
&gt;Even if Senator Leach's bill passes and female prisoners in Pennsylvania do not have to give birth in chains any more, they are still parted from their babies at birth This is really, really depressing. 
The Chinese!
Quite false. See one paragraph down: "But she would not tell a reporter what agency had issued the permits." There isn't any government agency that issues such permits, and Microsoft never produced any evidence that they had any permits. It is completely standard practice for PR to deny legal wrongdoing, whether or not it existed.   On an unrelated note, a big chunk (I don't know how much) of the Internet fallout that happened was an astroturf campaign by Interference Inc. I don't know if 10% of the downvotes on comments like this one come from II employees, and 90% from "real" redditors, or if 90% come from II employees, and 10% from redditors, but I do know that II specializes in this type of astroturf PR campaign, and was quite involved in actively participating in Internet damage control (posts and up/downvotes on web sites like reddit, edits to wikipedia, etc.) after the incident. 
It's the one eyed dog that gets me every time.  Darn you adorable, down-on-your-luck, little champ!  
I went to UPitt and I can tell you, the Carnegie Mellon guys were good at math, but thats about it.
Making a game.
Of course it is. Better assembly still runs better relatively, no matter how good it was originally.  And you can still follow how it works - read [Agner's manuals](http://agner.org/optimize/).
**TL;DR: I invited Jehovah's Witnesses in, let them try their hand at me and they have been visiting me regularly with no success for over 3 years**  After some years of dismissal in varying degrees in varying degrees of curtness or politeness (depending on my mood), I found myself opening the door to a man and a woman, who promptly launched into their spiel.  I was about to give them a pleasant dismissal when I stopped for a moment.  I am (and realized early on that I always have been) a die-hard rationalist.  Call it atheist, call it agnostic...I don't care.  What it means is that I don't *believe* anything.  Show me evidence of something and I'll accept it's factuality.  Show me a theory that makes sense and I'll apply it till something better comes along.  Give me convincing evidence that  you are more experienced than me in a given area and I will guardedly accept your word on the topic of your expertise (until I find a flaw or obvious falsehood).  I've seen no evidence that this aspect of my personality is shakeable in any way. I also genuinely like and believe in people.  I want people to have what they desire, within reason.  But religion confuses me.  How can someone spend their entire lives confining themselves to a set of behaviors based on text with no factual evidence to support it?  I reflected that, as it happened, I *did* have some time to spare.  It was my day off, I lived alone at the time, and I had not yet begun my day.  I wondered what would happen if I simply let them exhaust themselves trying to convert me.  No abuse, no intentional trapping of them in logical riddles, but also no giving ground, no accepting of anything that can't be proven and no accepting their definitions of morality.  I found myself saying: 'Yes, I do have some time to talk.  Would you like to come in?'  They came in, and I offered them everything at my disposal. 'Tea? Water? Beer? Whiskey? Food?'  I would not deign to accept their belief that my whiskey was in any way inferior to my water or my tea.  For the next 90 minutes, I sat with them and talked.  They of course attempted to lead me to their faith, and I in my place attempted to lead them to reason without ridiculing them.  I am a reasonably able debater, but this was a challenge.  Not because their logic was impeccable (it was not), but because the restraint of politeness and openness I had placed on myself forced me to avoid obvious logical traps and technicalities. Finally the man looked at his watch, thanked me for my time, and told me they had friends waiting for them in the car (were they waiting there the whole time?).   Then he surprised me by saying: 'I've really enjoyed this talk.  May we continue it again?' I told him that this was my regular day off.  They would be welcome to call upon me, and if I'm there I'll answer.  Sure enough, *they returned the next week*.  That was 3 years ago.  Sometimes they'll come every week for several weeks, sometimes 2 months will go by without me seeing them.  For the first several months it would be the same guy with a different attractive mid-20s woman of a different race each time, but then I began dating my girlfriend and mentioned her regularly.  After that, he switched to bringing an older parent or grandparent like figure.  I never pretend to be anything other than what I am: an unashamed rationalist.  When I was single, and I would mention that I was going out later that night, they would say 'good luck' and I would say 'thanks, I'm hoping to fornicate tonight.'  Eventually I moved about 2 miles away, *and I even gave them my new address*.  My girl I've been with for 2 years now is also an atheist, but much less interested in theology.  Out of respect for me, she is polite to them, but she also makes clear that if I'm not around, they should come back later.  In all this time, they have had exactly zero effect on my internal position re: religion.  I still view it as a mimetic disease I happen to have an immunity to.  But they offer me a fascinating glimpse into the mind of religious people, as I avoid the subject with the few people I know who are that way to prevent conflict.
Flocking to it?  &gt; TruTV in early December delivering the 17-year-old channel's largest-ever premiere audience -- 1.6 million people  1.6 million people in a country of 300 million+.  All three Ghost Hunters shows get higher ratings then this.  Steven Segal Lawman gets higher ratings than this.  The only shocking news in the article is that Tru TV has been around for 17 years and its highest rating ever is 1.6 million
no i meant "here here" as in here are people that agree...that's my excuse anyway...
Oh blah! Krugman is a human being. He's not omniscient. Stop being such a terminology Nazi.
There is the horror movie where I think the kids were digging a hole or something in the backyard and it leads to hell or something.  Anyway this big ugly monster comes out of the hole after a series of other crazy monsters have come out and the kid kills it with his model rocket...  That movie scared me for years.
Sometimes people are turned off to certain types of music because of the people associated with it.
&gt;IanMcKellen wants children to use IE6
Ha! Contrast that with contacting them about iPlayer (radio) failures.
i have to try this!
i vow to maintain my sanity in this environment.  i don't want to be another "dumb american getting fucked up in different country".  
Ask her father.
Get rid of it. You're never going to use it anymore, and nobody likes a pack rat.
Write your code so that others can read it.   If in reading your source it makes sense for the comment to occur after the code, go for it.  In general it's far more common and practical to put the comment before the code or at the end of the relevant line.
I always keep a clean [desktop](http://imgur.com/6AUG7.jpg)
I'm not depressed myself. But I know what it's like for the thread creator, for I've been there. And very little actually helps when you're at the bottom of the pit of despair.   I actually gave him similar advice to yours about staying busy.
You've hit the good part. Remove 9mm and make like you're God.
Paulson also wore a digital - an Ironman IIRC.  A lot of bankers wear them for timing trades.
Gremlins. Creeped me the fuck out. Especially the whole back-popping birth bit. 
I agree, I was disappointed that only a slimmed-down version of the wards existed, the citadel seemed so large before, now it's just claustrophobic. I understand why they designed it that way, but I think by not being able to visit the presidium they missed out on a great way to really substantially tie the two games together. It would have helped I think to have at least one area mostly unchanged that you visit; places are a huge anchor.
this one had me howling throughout barnesnnoble 
Before
They would just cover it up. Everyone was required to have a towel to sit on so there was always fabric lying around.  I guess that could also be a good time to flip onto your stomach to tan = ) I honestly only had to make an issue out of it a few times.  
Juggalo's I.Q. &lt; 75
&gt;it's not Apple limiting what sites you can visit. it's flash based websites doing the limiting.  Slightly true (do to your obfuscating). The artificial disabling of flash limits you. That is all there is to it. You can say that there are problems with flash but making it not work is to keep people buying apps and that is it.   You sound like you are a developer. I don't get why you don't even try to comment on flash not being allowed on Apples mobile platform. That's the conversation we are actually having.   &gt;flash is nice, but it's a memory/cpu hog, and the cause of many a user pains, crashes being just the tip of the iceberg.  Maybe you should switch to PC's. Just about every PC made in the last 5 years can handle flash without a problem.
http://www.reddit.com/r/baconbits
Yeah, items just go from the UPS truck, jump through midair into a box with a packing slip and a label and into another UPS truck all by themselves.
"A person has 46 chromosomes therefore at most 46 ancestors in each generation"  What?  You act like you lose a chromosome when you reproduce.  Go look up Meiosis.  The biology teacher in me wants to scream.  
Oh wow! Have a cookie!
I wish on my server there would be 6+ attempts. Being on an elitist server (Mal'Ganis), if the group doesn't get it within the first 2 attempts the group disbands. It's sickening getting saved after the first boss of ToC
I don't think so. History will be re-written by the next superpower and it will be from their perspective.
thank you for censoring that :)  edited screen: http://i.imgur.com/58IMF.jpg  
The article noted that the proposal was supposed to get 100mbps to a majority of Britons.  As you note there are places in the US today where one can get 50+mpbs today, but the vast majority of people get far lower speeds as noted by the much lower average speeds in the US.
I was actually fairly shocked by this (As funny as it is). It has the most swearing I have ever heard out of The Onion. Out of left field you get the cocksuckers, and the motherfuckers...it's nuts.
The first one is a great great movie.  I think the phone turning into his tongue freaked me out the most.
I went sledding in a park with my girlfriend last winter, shortly before dusk.  We drove the 20 minute trip back home, went onto... other activities... when she realized she lost her phone.  We looked at each other in horror, knowing exactly how and where it would have fallen out of her coat.  We returned to the snow hill after dusk, already dark, taking my flexible flyer down to the base of the hill-- and boy, with the temperature drop between when we left and when we returned, we *flew* down-- and began searching for her phone.  Talk about a needle in a haystack.  Then in a moment of inspiration, I asked, "Your phone's on, right?"  She grinned, I called it, and we saw a little mound of snow light up LED-blue about 30 feet from where we were standing.
We need a 24/7 LIVE WEBCAM on and in that IGLOO!!!!  can any redditor help?
Conheça as funcionalidades desse Sistema Operacional totalmente on-line.
I don't nag. It's super counterproductive. 
Indeed. However, he's still sending more people to die for an unjust war. :) Just as bad as Bush.
Once somebody was doing a corner kick in soccer, and the ball was errant in the air and coming towards me, so thrust my leg in the air behind me to try to kick it, and I caught it between my calf and my thigh.
How many times has the director saved your ass??  be honest
I agree with some of the other posters I think it might be cattapillar.  spiders are usually small even big spiders start out in small sacks.
musical preference is totally personal taste, and impossible to explain, it just ''is''
You, sir, are a disgrace! Here, have an upvote.
Not when I was homeless, that was sorta after my time. I knew Elaine from when I was homeless though as she did outreach back then, and we talked about her opening PSKS. I'm quite fond of that place.
No actually, this one is not on him...it's the FEDERALIST sleeper cells and "career" conservatives in Justice, making judgments like this one here...
What me worry?
: (
women are still paid less than men for the same job so their are some inequalities that need to be dealt with and education is a great place to do ir. and even if at New Trier affirmative action gets skewed, at my school (south side of Chicago 95% black 80% free lunch) it is hugley important and allows alot of smart people who never would have other wise been able to go to college go to college. their parents didnt have that opportunity(for the most part). parental education level has huge impact on student test scores. lower education of parents = worse results on test scores. the national poverty rate for black people is 25 % for hispancis 23 % for white people 9 % so the need is much greater. (im white and jewish). i agree that in an ideal world scholarships would be based on income and not race but that can only happen when we even out the income disparity. 
&gt; Where? You seem to be confusing my comment with other comments deeper in the thread.  No, I'm explicitly referring to comments deeper in the thread when I say "misses the discussion we were actually having in favor of the one you think is more important."  We doesn't refer to you.  It refers to me and the people I was talking to when you barged in and talked about a fundamentally different topic and acted like I didn't know the difference between two topics that I personally had explicitly separated several messages prior.  &gt; &gt; Semantics just aren't the issue here  &gt; Says who?  Both of the people in the discussion you're trying to barge into.  &gt; &gt; in a discussion explicitly about performance just isn't going anywhere  &gt; Again, that's not the discussion  You don't get to redefine a discussion by barging into it.  I'm not interested in the discussion you're trying to have.  &gt; Right, almost everything I learn in #haskell is deep wisdom :-)  Uh huh.  &gt; Please try to address the issue next time.  Ah, tu quoque.  How nice.  I tell you you're off issue in a discussion that didn't involve you until you barged in, and you say I'm off topic in return.  I hope you'll understand if I don't reply to your next tooth gritting.
[My #! Linux setup](http://imgur.com/zeNu8.jpg)
No.  You are stupid.
A sex toy site for people into dismemberment.  I guess there *is* something out there for everybody...
*Mac*amatics? matha*mac*ics?
It's all in your head.
Every time I see something like this, I feel more and more like caving in and starting to prey on them like everyone else.  NOW FOR ONLY $10 GET LIFETIME SUBSCRIPTION TO FACEBOOK, LIMITED TIME OFFER!!!  BUY NOW OR BE STUCK PAYING $48 A YEAR FOREVER!  A SAVINGS OF OVER $4788 (compared to paying $3.99 a month for 100 years).  Edit: I see trollzilla got there first, we should start a company ;)
http://imgur.com/eJ2cm weeeeeeeee
&gt; Naked mole rats appear to have a high resistance to cancer; cancer has never been observed in them.  Research on the blind mole rat may help in combatting many human ailments: * [Genetic Mechanism In Mole Rats Can Be Targeted In Cancer Research](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2009/03/090315223845.htm)  * [Blind Mole Rats Shed Light On Diseases Caused By Lack Of Oxygen](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2007/01/070117091316.htm)  * [Naked Mole Rats May Hold Clues to Surviving Stroke](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2009/11/091130141313.htm)  * [Ugly Duckling Mole Rats Might Hold Key To Longevity](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2007/10/071015225336.htm) When people say about a particular creature "Who cares if it disappears?", the naked mole rat is one of the creatures I think about. Who knows what we might be able to learn from some creature, even if it isn't cuddly and pretty in our eyes.   
You don't appear to have actually used an e-ink device, so how can you possibly make the claim that you prefer books against something you haven't even used?
Does this mean I can't take my PornStation Portable to the hospital and watch a collection of pregger porn while I wait for it?
How about you stop gobbling donkey cocks?
I don't know why people are voting you down for discussing this.  Have an upvote.
Nice try dad.
It's been experimentally verified.  It is not a theory.
I like them.  I control what gets packed with what and how much is packed in each bag.  Always packed the way I want it to. In addition the self checkout lanes are almost always shorter.
Y'all say it like is the last resort, like they're desperate. Porn is a major point against the ShittyPad, I browse porn sites everyday.
&gt;I just used logic  I don't see how using a human as a biotic specialist for the paralyzing drone attack part (which only affects humans) was "logic". Your characters didn't die because they were loyal, not because of logic...
Buy used. 3000$ should do.   Get a low consuption car (small motor) that will not breack down, toyota is good. You dont need aircon and electric windows, u know ? 
Truth
[United States of Eurasia by Muse](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eB1OkuN8vdU) is very Queen like. (2:40 is a Queen explosion)
Here's the actual [game](http://www.stephenking.com/discordia/core.htmlhttp://www.stephenking.com/discordia/core.html).
Spoilers, I didn't know he was a fucking douche.. fucking douche.
I work with credit cards all the time (I was even directly responsible for the creation and deployment of the reservation and credit card processing system for one of LiveNation's larger venue partners), and I've never had to run my credit as a matter of qualification for employment in my career.  The only exception to this was when during a dry spell for design before the web took off, when I took a corporate sales job for a major brick-and-mortar computer and electronics retailer who was bought out and subsequently went under a few years back.  But I didn't know any better back when I took the job, so I allowed it.  I've since discovered that if you let your employers walk all over you during the hiring process, they'll continue to do so throughout your employment.  (I left that job after I was asked to cover for fellow employees who were committing fraud.)  Perhaps people like that are why they run your credit for retail.
We are using Condorcet voting for the name vote.
There's a lot of reasons she could be stressed out, especially if you've never seen each other.  For instance, imagine you were going to see her for the first time and you knew you were going to be frustrated and angry the whole weekend because someone else there just drives you up the wall.  You'd be able to give less than 100%, which would basically ruin your first meetup.  That would suck.  I don't know if that's what is going through her head, but it may be?  Either way, it's kinda mean for you to say "well, I don't care at all about how you're actually feeling, because you SHOULD be feeling this way."  I know it is frustrating to feel like you aren't the most important thing in her life, but you aren't.  Actually, it seems like she isn't the most important thing in yours as you aren't willing to put her feelings first in this matter.  But yeah, you had a fight.  Fights are hard LDR because cutting communication off (basically running from the fight) is so easy.  And you both are.  You might think you aren't, but that line "come and find me when you're ready" is just downright cruel.  Why not try "Hey, I'm sorry, let's please talk about this.  I really want to work this out.  This sucks and I love you and I want to talk to you."  What you said is basically "well I'm taking my ball and going home, walk the walk of shame over to my house when you want to play some more."  You really can't afford to say stuff like that in LDR, because you're basically counting on her to make that trek.  She may not.  So yes, you screwed up.  But she still cares about you.  Get a trip to see her to happen, stay open, compassionate and loving with her.  Try to remain mature and calm.  But most of all, try to figure out why she's doing the things she is and help THAT.
You can exchange sexual favors for ebooks you know.  I play play to loose. 
Am I the only one who uses a mac for OSX?
Not wrong, just struck me as odd. It is a reasoned approach, which we should value.
As a Leafs fan I'm torn between being super excited about this trade and being super jealous of Bruins fan above.
My grass gets mowed... I pay some company to send out a truckload of hispanic workers, who I assume are legally employed in this country and making more than minimum wage.  If they weren't that would be a crime.
damn, that's quite a stash there.
&gt;We both know this is nonsense, but it is something we need to demonstrate to them.   Quite right.  Only problem is it's tough to demonstrate.  I've got no idea how.
You made it to the end?
Obama was a Harvard educated Constitutional law professor.  He knows FAR more about Constitutional case law than Ron Paul ever will.  Ron hides behind the Constitution when some of his bills, such as the Sanctity of Life act, seek to circumvent the separation of powers clause.
&gt;" On a mildly related note, http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GpQSJjK_ENg "  Was any of that supposed to make sense?
he did provide unexpected awesomeness on Christmas Eve, when he opened up an online store for [Rephlex Records](http://www.rephlex.com/) and provided the Analord series, in it's entirety along with extra unheard tracks, as pre-mastered .wav and .mp3 files.  many other Rephlex releases are available there too, including The Tuss' Rushup Edge album (although, curiously missing the Confederation Trough EP)
Oh, so, so many.....  'Taxi' for pointless, zero plot, driving mayhem  "La Femme Nikita", well for just everything really - including the original? cleaner.  And if we are allowed a polish director, then "Three Colours - Red" for sheer unadulterated passion.  (following the pristine horror and emptiness of Blue and White - I cannot watch Blue without taking several breaks).  edit: spelling
Yes.
I love the wallpaper; did you make it yourself?
tl;dr  The libertarian has no clothes.
Yes, exactly! MiB is a shape-changer, not a spirit that inhabits corpses. This is a way simpler way for him to appear as Jack's dad, and other dead people that have appeared briefly in the island since Season 1. 
After post-collapse comes apo-collapse.  What does it matter what skills you have?
Or you don't like the dogma for some other reason, but are in fact not thinking for yourself, but jumping on some bandwagon.
That's not exactly minor.
Do you know what moron means? 
*Your* life maybe. I don't get to talk to my friends about selling anal virginity rights to someone else, and I think that makes me a little sad.
Back in 2003, I had a digital camera that took AA batteries. I'd just gotten a new set of NiMH rechargables for it, so I was disappointed when they apparently fell out of my camera case while I was at the beach with my friends. Two days later I was back at the same beach and while sunbathing I was absentmindedly digging in the sand. Suddenly felt something hard, like a rock. Yep, it was my batteries.
Unless your idol is [Farrah](http://www.mtv.com/shows/teen_mom/cast_member.jhtml?personalityId=13167). [Maci](http://www.mtv.com/shows/teen_mom/cast_member.jhtml?personalityId=13165) is the only decent mom on that show. [Amber](http://www.mtv.com/shows/teen_mom/cast_member.jhtml?personalityId=13166) is a moron who has a supportive baby's daddy, but is trying to get rid of him.... like she could do better.  The show is emotional porn.
You know what, this is fucking bullshit, a woman, most sensitive of creatures has no social impetus to hold off on calling her man out if he gets over weight.  Equality bitches, suck that shit up.
Night of the living Dead.  The Exorcist.
I saw that in middle school with my cousin, and she was clutching my arm the entire time, making it a lot scarier for me. I couldn't sleep that night, and the next day my jaw hurt like hell because I'd been clenching it since the damn movie started.
This!  To echo the parent's point, there's a reason humans discovered calculus and physics before we figured out evolution: evolution is not intuitive.
Except a pencil is superior to a keyboard if you need to take notes that involve things like underlining, bubbles, arrows, diagrams, and at-will placement of text.  An e-reader capable of markup via stylus would be quite awesome indeed.
No way, I use Firefox, I just avoid PDFs whenever at all possible.
The difference is that there is a significant gap between a day, a week, and a month. Not quite true with a Fortnight.  Week= 7 days  Fortnight = 2 weeks  Month = 4 weeks  See? Fortnight is the smallest.
A lot of people talk about being scared. My movie wasn't scary at all, but more psychological (not psychological scary either!).  This movie disturbed me because it was purely psychological was called eXistenZ. It just bothered me thinking about actual existence; had me thinking philosophically for weeks.
The only time I ever see it is in relationships. And, while not a big deal, it does grate on me just a bit. I'm not at all fond of pet names, baby talk, etc. 
A few years ago at a friend's house for dinner and there is this moth fluttering around inside. We're all about to sit down and someone mentions the moth.  I'm standing over near the window which is open but has a screen over it. In the screen in a tiny tear - like the size of a coin.  I say "hey moth - come out through this hole".  Immediately the moth (which is about four metres away in the kitchen) turns and flies straight toward me and out the tiny hole.  Everyone stands there, stunned.
Definitely an awesome picture.  And number 41 does an incredible job of capturing the raw emotion of grief in the midst of war.
[Addressing Climate Crisis, Bush Calls For Development Of National Air Conditioner.](http://www.theonion.com/content/news/addressing_climate_crisis_bush) 
he was sex on legs i would have like to seehim and roxy get together
The First thing that comes to mind happened near the end of my busing shift a few years back. We had only one table at the end of the night, and since I knew them it wasn't really a big deal for me to unset the other tables. First I went around, collecting all the silverware rolls, and the second time around I grabbed all the bread plates. Just as I'm nearing the bus station with, say, a stack of just over 35 plates, the guy starts bullshitting with me, and I notice he just finished his app. Do I wait to put my plates down before grabbing it? No, because it's late and I need to get this guy going on his next course so I can leave. So I hold the stack of plates with my right hand, and grab his app with my left, but as I lean in, the stack of plates becomes more unstable than intended.    Ninja shit.   They fall, but I manage to save all 35 by crouching and sliding my right elbow unnaturally far behind my back, pinning them to my body. He near shat himself, and ended up tipping me a buck per plate
There's a lot going on down there in the taskbar. Win7 makes it pretty easy to hide some of that junk.
3) Straight though the nostril.  But seriously, 2 makes me hiccup, so 1 is how I smoke cigs/joint/bowl.
&gt;tuutruk makes no sense, but still wins because his mother loves him.
This is you mind after Avatar.
WTF is wrong with its eyeballs?
25-ish pages on the correlation between national leaders (Presidents, Prime Ministers) and the popular music of specific nations. 
I know it was a bitchy statement, there are plenty of amazing and wonderful men out there. I know many, many honest, trust worthy and true gentlemen, but they tend to be my relatives so that's a no go.
Yeah, at least now you are.
'Smile and hope for the best' is seldom an effective strategy, at least when dealing with issues more serious than being dragged along to a boring dinner party. 
You arrange all your icons on the right because you really want a mac, right?
"C.H.U.D." Cannibalistic Humanoid Underground Dwellers.  Back when things could first be taped from TV, my older brother's friend ripped it from HBO, brought that over and made me watch it with them. I was 10 and it scared the F#$% out of me.  
2,974 September 11 casualties.  That means we need 297,400 Iraqi deaths.  Nowhere near finished. Plus 901 American casualties in Afghanistan, necessitating another 90,100 dead.  Plus 244 American contractors killed, meaning another 24,400 we'll need to take out.  Plus 4,379 American dead.  We need to kill another 437,900 Iraqis and other assorted brown people. Total is 849,800 total deaths we need to inflict.  
That wouldn't be a "disclaimer", that would be a "declaration of interest"
That burger is a heart attack!!!!
Upvoted since I live in Milford.
Oh looky, a "Fox News Fan"! How cute!
Not again!?  The fundamental problem is not the inaccuracy of grades (which is inherent in grades), it's the policy of using grades.  Refer to [The Dangerous Myth of Grade Inflation](http://www.alfiekohn.org/teaching/gi.htm)
Damn the Russians! America should have gotten that sale in first!
Somebody could make exactly the opposite argument: it's a disappointment to see the sorry state of human compilers today -- they are not getting any better at generating code at decent speeds, and they probably never will.
He's so black that life cannot escape his surface.
wanting something all of the time, and getting it all of the time.
Nice work! I've heard such good things about it. I hope you keep updating. 
Is there any sort of Month where it is really slow? Or should I just pick rainy days? Thanks!
lol my roommate is like that. It's annoying as hell.
I agree with you.  Up was meant for adults, not children.
I bought two 5m DVI-HDMI cables for $0.88 each.  Where I used to work anything that didn't sell automatically reduced in price over time. Found a whole heap in a store-room one time. Me and about 10 random customers couldn't belive our luck!
Out of your seat and to the damn restraunt! 
This is just amazing.
I was slightly confused, but now you just kicked me into a whole other level of weirdness.  Which isn't a bad thing though!
[A Statement Followed By A Question Separated By A Colon; An Effective Journalistic Technique?](http://www.theonion.com/content/magazine/a_statement_followed_by_a/)
Claymores And Scavenger.
My problem with Lars is musicianship aside, the dude is a total dick.  Some guys are in the business for the music, he's in it for the business, and that's respectable to a lot of people, but not me.  There are guys with less talent but more passion that I'd rather listen to.
Winamp has a clean, straightforward UI if you don't use the newer-style skins. I just load up all 10K of my songs on shuffle and use "j" (jump to file) to play or queue what I want.   Foobar is nice (I use it to listen to albums), but its UI is much more like iTunes which doesn't make sense for shuffling a bunch of songs. 
[German Luftwaffle Chain Offers Waffles, Overwhelming Air Superiority](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/39674)
I''m incredibly machiavellian and hide it very well. I feel loyal to nobody but myself despite having many close friends.
I've got some therapy for theists...their own execution in front of a full length mirror.
Seriously, I would like to know.
I always keep my wireless turned off on my kindle (to save battery life) and I don't buy any DRM ebooks from amazon. All my ebooks are open and untouchable by Amazon. 
My birthday is on groundhogs day (two days from now) so I'd like to see a groundhog please.
Fair enough, but come on now. You're first telling me it's not different at all, and now telling me there are all sorts of subcultures I'm dismissing with a broad brush.   Yes, Nashville is a city, but like I said, I work with folks in the rural area who are "country" and I wanted to be less awkward. NOW I FEEL REALLY AWKWARD, THX :(
HAHAHAHAH. Hello tinman!
Our Long National Nightmare of Peace and Prosperity Is Over http://www.theonion.com/content/node/28784
Well it seems like your lack of pleasure has made you apathetic.  Since you don't experience pleasure, do you have any intersts at all?  I know I experience pleasure, but it's kind of hard to classify for me.  I feel good sometimes, most of the time i'm just content and i feel bad at times.  When I'm in a good mood, I like to think of that as pleasure, but i also get pleasure from solving problems, or at least the intense focus and accomplishing things leaves me feeling good afterwards.  I would love to hear what happens if you tried ecstasy, I wonder if you just don't have any serotonin to release, or if you just don't "feel" the effect.
sometimes, if there's a dark shower curtain, I think there's going to be someone (something?!?!) on the other side when I pull it aside. It works both ways, getting out of the shower and getting in. I'm 23, and a perfectly rational adult. 
It does not, by default, mean unfettered, destructive hedonism. But a moral atheist life, in terms of making responsible, self-critical decisions to maximize satisfaction and freedom for both the self and others will look functionally similar to a life "constrained" by the recommendations of orthodox Christianity.  Your "pro tip" formula seemed to imply that you would fill your life with sinful pleasures. The problem is that both orthodox Christians and secular humanists agree on what constitutes "sin" in terms of hurting the self and others. Under Christianity, "sin" is not merely that which violates arbitrary imperatives. The New Covenant is all about consequential action in service of the "kingdom of God" which, in a Venn diagram, overlaps strongly with humanism (since God's benevolence is in terms of his desire to optimize mankind's freedom and satisfaction over the long run).  In other words, as far as everday personal and social decisionmaking goes, if you're a terrible Christian, you're also a terrible humanist, and vice versa.
I know I was gonna bet burned at the stake for that. I was just upset. I love you men!
Here is [mine](http://imgur.com/UUNcm.jpg). 
Tie fine thread or dental floss around it close to your skin, extremely tight, to cut off the blood supply. It will die and fall off by itself after several days. Cover it with a bandage while you're waiting if it's out in the open or you think clothes will snag on it. 
Yes, because her health is his responsibility.
I once saw a lady of indeterminate age poop on the roof of a taxi on 14th street.
Do you make your friends take a test to go out drinking with you? Where's the fun?
What claims?  I am confused over this.  The Roman empire, especially towards the end, was massively militaristic.  Soldier were often fought for land and slaves.  Some historians have even argued the fall of Rome was a good thing for Europe.  That being said Rome is the perfect example of a lack of data, where it is hard to conclude anything strongly.  I am thinking you maybe a troll, as your post is contradictory - making claims without data then pronouncing that I should not make claims without data (which I have not even done).
I agree. Schrödinger never stated the cat would not be there if not observed, only the probability that it would be dead or alive. Which actually, is true for us as well. If I recall, that simplification used to infuriate him. Of course, I don't know for sure, I wasn't there.
Guys are romantic, sensitive beings just like girls. Most don't show it. As a guy something thoughtful is always nice. I think it is more for the guy to treat the girl but I would be nicely suprised if my SO got me something.
WTF.  This entire thread makes no sense to me.
I'd probably just freeze out momentarily on this one but if I had to say something, "I wasn't aware that we were fishing for responses. Is that what men you encounter normally do? Seems a bit disingenuous, no?"
[Paint.net](http://www.getpaint.net/), actually
There is already a solution to this that works reasonably well;  that's to link to old conversations in the original post and/or in the comments.
why does being a teacher make fuzzy legs a no-no?
If you made a list of the most common causes of scratched glass that you're WALKING on, accidentally dropped cameras wouldn't even make the top ten.  There is no doubt in my mind that they SELL post cards, calanders, posters, picture books, and simple pictures to turists as well as charge too much to walk on that stupid glass walkway. It has nothing to do with fear of scatches. If you're that naive, you can't possibly live in the states. It is ALWAYS about the dollars. 
Haven't seen it yet.
A moderator in a small reddit called Equality who pissed this guy off.
For this to be convincing, you need to analyse the screening process and the effects on the associated type 1/2 errors against the utility of increased donations. A cost/benefit model might be illuminating.
that's... hot?
The behavior wasn't defined before and the behavior also wasn't defined after the release.  The documentation is bad because it only tells you what's usually returned, but it doesn't tell you about the things that function might return.  You see, users are reading the documentation because they want to know these things. Even more so if error handling is very inconsistent as it is with PHP.  For example `strpos` returns a `boolean FALSE` if "needle" wasn't found. The documentation tells you this important detail. It might for example also return -1 or `NULL` instead.  Good documentation tells you everything you need to know.
My God, those Sprint ads are like a puzzle game just to make go away!
Me too, except they weren't mine.
::glances at username::  Dammit.
Please tell me that people dried off with a [dicktowel](http://dicktowel.com/)
Wow they should  make the Freedom Tower.
`PROGRESSION OF TERROR:`  ^_^  ⊙▂⊙  ◎▃◎  ∙▂∙
I am so thrilled so many people are concerned about my diet. I wish just two of them would agree.
Uhm, American tourist are rude and inconsiderate as well, man.
LOl! ajjqFIAkfjafja
It's true. 
Wait. Let's be real here. He is asking why they are expensive.   &gt;small, easy, unassuming and uncomplicated - the exact opposite of any modern DSLR.  Aka, less customizable. These things are great, but don't explain the price.   &gt;Don't even get me started on the merits of shooting fast prime lenses that are sharper than the devil's tongue  The 5d has a better sensor. So sharp lenses on the leica are limited by the lack of detail the sensor produces. Besides, (you can use leica lenses on a 5d II) &lt;- edit: redacted.   &gt;all without compromise due to the lack of retrofocus issues  Wow. Nice stretch. See, it doesn't have autofocus issues *because it doesn't have autofocus.*  If I have AF issues, I can turn off the AF and save **$9,000.**   &gt; I also think they're priced fairly  They're priced like a Leica.  It's a luxury item because of the utility it had in the street-photography days of Cartier-Bresson.   They are no longer a luxury item, no longer without competition, and the price is being held up primarily by hipsters who want the red badge.   &gt;Scanned negs still beat the shit out of digital  No, they don't.  When you compare format-to-format, digital wins. Leaf backs beat medium format film (**Edit:** after some research, I've discovered that the 1ds III and 5d II also handily defeat medium format), and Canon's last 3 full-frame bodies have beat the IQ of 35mm film *even at ISO 100*.  Digital surged ahead of film in terms of color accuracy nearly a decade ago.
[Doesn't have the boxart, just the titles.](http://www.funnytitles.com/)
Clean your godamn email.
Thanks for giving me some context. I am unaware of a history of retired rugby players committing suicide though that doesn't mean of course that it doesn't happen, just that I've personally never heard of  brain damage / emotional problems being a risk for rugby players. Sudden athlete death yes. Occaisonal horrific spinal injury yes. Regular broken bones too. And from a very anecdotal perspective, the majority of retired rugby players I know are very articulate. (The rest I doubt could ever string two words together). I know also that certainly in youth rugby, if a player is concussed, he is not permitted to play for 2 weeks.  Also the only rugby player with whom I have ever had a discussion on the subject of head injury, said that the one time he had concussion  was caused by a post match injury - he drunkenly walked into a swing door. 
Bar crawl in Lil Five anyone? Start at the Corner Tavern or the Euclid Avenue Yacht Club?
see the earth is taco shaped argument
Found my Uncles wedding ring in a Center Parks rapid, Before I knew he'd lost it.
Yes, the bike will be fine.
Whatever it is, i declare you torch it.
Does the fat guy count as two people? I thi... oh wait they're both fat.
Thanks for replying.  I'll share my experience of panic as well:  I was at home eating dinner, while my grandmother was upstairs fixing up my younger brother's room.  I heard a loud noise, as if something fell, and ran up to see what happened.  She had been standing on a chair to clean above the windows or something and fell and hit her wrist on the metal edge of the bed.  She showed me the wrist: ~-shaped instead of - shaped.  At this sight, I definitely panicked - I had never seen a bodily injury like this before, and nobody else was home, so I called 911.  While this is never a bad thing, to call 911 in an emergency, I should have realized her injury wasn't life threatening and didn't require an ambulance or 911.  In retrospect I could've called the neighbor to drive her to the hospital, or the non-emergency line, or a cab, or whatever.  I think, however, this is anecdotal evidence that the mind goes with what it knows, and shuts out creative thought when under stress. Interesting too, that 911 works best when you are informative and obedient to the operator.  This is also exactly what the panicked brain wants: to be told what to do if it can't draw from experience or lessons.  The fact that this guy called 911 shouldn't be used as evidence of his stupidity, but rather evidence that he had probably literally ran out of ideas, and was outsourcing the thinking to someone who is trained not to panic and solve problems.  Think about Sully.  He didn't land successfully because he's a genius or creative or he's a real man or what have you.  He was able to land because in panic mode, you draw from experience, and his experience was immense in that area, both airplanes and gliders and I think he may have had more training with water simulation as well.  He was practically the best pilot to have flying a plane in that situation - not because of his incredible thinking power, or his abnormal mode of dealing with panic, but because he was prepared for that moment, and entered the situation with plenty of experience, knowledge, and even knowledge of how to use the knowledge (emergency procedures) that he and the co-pilot were able to leverage.   To find an example where this type of thinking was used but didn't work, compare these two wikpedia articles: [Airliner accidents and incidents caused by mechanical failure](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Category:Airliner_accidents_and_incidents_caused_by_mechanical_failure) with [Aviation accidents and incidents officially attributed to pilot error](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Category:Aviation_accidents_and_incidents_officially_attributed_to_pilot_error).  These cases, where human error is the cause, are examples of the limitations of narrow, focused, depth-first thinking when it comes to solving problems outside of the person's knowledge or experience.  A plane has too many variables for a pilot to memorize every possible combination of simultaneous failures, so instead they have a system of dealing with emergencies that works pretty well, and they follow it to a T.  This type of problem-solving works well for quickly finding the known fix to a known problem - but absolutely fails at coming up with creative solutions to unpredictable problems. If you ignore the profound effect that panic has on the way the brain thinks about problems, and instead blame it all on the individual and their stupidity or clumsiness, then you have to conclude that every pilot listed on that page just weren't smart enough to fly their plane.  They all somehow snuck by the licensing board, and got a license while being complete dummies.  Just as this officer here was too dumb to stop his car.  This attitude is neither in touch with reality nor right.
Ah ok, so badboy + an artistic skill (I *think* you could call the sort of cooking he does an "art", some might disagree) then?  Is being able to cook *really* a turn-on?  I mean, I know it's *useful*, but sexually stimulating?
Well, you're makin it do what it do while smokin that kush-kush, in hopes that she'll let you smash.   
1) Suffering conditions of chickens in the factories  2) The grinding of male chicks into nuggets, supporting the meat industry.  If I could buy eggs safely, I still don't think I would have an ethical problem with it. But, its been long enough that I would find it pretty gross today.
The Dark Crystal  damn you Jim Hensson :(
Yeah, probably. Didn't occur to me, I guess because I have never used my emergency brake...
You're in a different part of the world than me, making your date hard to decipher.  ...Yeah, not much to complain about.
How f ing stupid. You, sir, are a moron
I had no idea this was a thing.  I'm constantly comparing my neighbour's cat to Hitler.
I eat cinnamon toast crunch every night dude its so great
There is a reason `whore` rhymes with `more`.
Your dock icons are huge and your desktop icons are tiny. It's driving me insane!!!
Haha, I do exactly the same thing. I have folders like crap, random, stuff, everything, etc.. Which are my desktop dumps.
I do not think that you look like a lesbian, but you are somewhat feminine. Some girls (and plenty of gay guys) dig this, so it isn't a problem, but may impact the types of people who are interested in you. Definitely not ugly though. 
It wasn't a desert eagle.
But then again, think about how much publicity Adult Swim got from this incident.
Wait, I'm confused. Is Terry Pratchett supporting assisted suicide just in general or specifically for him?
That's probably why he said right attachment....and an attachment with anything that can cause static electricity (like one of those nozzles with the fake (or real) hair bristles is probably the wrong type of attachment). Get something with a narrow mouth with a preferable rubber or soft plastic end and you could argue it is better than compressed air (likely less direct force and you're not just blowing dust up into the air but removing it almost completely from the environment).
What would the backlash be if you made [this segment](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y5C2gihnEkE) about a bear in a nearby city?
Child support was out of the picture since it doesn't exist in my country (unless the father officially recognizes the child).
Wow, pretty impressive, considering most only challenge themselves to drink a Gallon of milk, while drinking a [Galleon](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Galleon) is quite a bit more.
I found alternative tv series on line, nowetv.com. Many tv series currently show in us at this website. very clean site. Smallville, Glee, Dexter, Bones, CSI, Stargate, How I met Your Mother, The mentalist. Grey anatomy and lot more. I enjoy all the show
I used the dpad for movement. Its not perfect but it works. Then i column-down the buttons: WESDZX where z and x are the not-frequently-used shoulder buttons
To elaborate on this comment, take a look at the [phase diagram for water](http://bhs.smuhsd.org/science-dept/marcan/apchemistry/h2ophase.gif).  If you apply more pressure, it converts to water, lubricating the sled.
"arranged" = torrented?
I would much rather have real-life popularity. Chicks dig it.
Really?  I am so annoyed by Ben.  His lies just represent lazy writing.  For most of seasons 3, 4, and 5 he's Deus Ex Machina.
Cool Site
I have never understood this. And who even cares about kissing? If they were naked and eating each other out I can see it being worth noting, but kissing? Really?
Probably still faster than most regular checkout lanes.
I couldn't agree more. ;)
Nothing yet but I don't live near any of the Venues.
Ok a [background image](http://i.imgur.com/Z4Tsy.jpg) is as good as you are going to get. I have top secret desktop icons and programs pinned to my taskbar.
window dressing .
Shit, I might take a train in. I always wanted to go.
So I was looking back through my submissions looking for a certain link, and I *just* noticed your username.  Hey you! Lookin' good. o/
aflac is everywhere
Well done!
That's my main gripe with ebooks - same price for no physical product?   If i'm spending 15 dollars on a book, I want to keep it regardless of technological change or digital restrictions. Hopefully soon books will come with ebook downloads, like many vinyl records come with mp3 downloads.
&gt;I don't care that the App Store is a closed system. I can jailbreak for myself and I think the closed system works better for most users.  The problem is that that still leaves you at the whim of Apple. If they want to break your iPad they can. If they don't want to they still might., albeit on accident. People can't write their own apps for it; they have to go through the app store.
Excellent comments. Have an upvote.
Yeah, that's what I was generally trying to go for there.
I recently started insanity and I was thinking about doing a post similar to this. Great progress though, man!
Broadband is overrated.  I have 100mbps at home, my ISP offers up to 1Gbps synchronous here (if you're willing to shell out 250€/month), and quite frankly, this is totally useless.  Yeah it's kinda nice to download stuff at 9MB/sec, but it requires that whoever is at the other end of the pipe is capable of transmitting at such high speeds (which is not common), and I seldom download stuff.
The knife was one of the few redeeming qualities of the movie (because it was so hilarious)
yea spousal immunity exists but the drug laws are draconain any person living in a place where drugs are present can be charged and convicted of possession even if they didnt know about it.
Your second point is valid.  What separates healthy skepticism from denial, however, is skeptics base their disbelief on evidence.   Climate deniers, for the most part, do not cite evidence, they do not understand the evidence they cite, or they base their conclusions on facts that are irrelevant.  For example, evolution deniers frequently argue that since Darwin was an atheist the mountains of data that support the theory of evolution are irrelevant.  This is not skepticism but denial.  
He changed his behavior after sex because that's all he was interested in.  To him, you're just another notch on his bedpost. Where as you were genuinely enjoying his company, he was just doing and saying what he had to to get you in bed.  Holding out sex longer is probably the best way to fight this.  If you do this you'll find that instead of the guy changing after sex, he'll change at some random point prior to sex.  This isn't to say that all guys will, just the ones who want nothing more than what you're hiding in your pants.
White people go out of their way to tell people they're not a racist
Why not?  They're part of the Executive, and he's the Chief Executive.  He can just reject the recommendation.
I am offended that you found my comment offensive.
Paragraphs man... Paragraphs.
That's why it's per capita. 
Oh cool!  You're welcome.  I'm glad it's useful.  
perros pitbull information
[This one](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hEhutIEUq8k) is pretty great, and Queen-like, as well.
I saw NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD (the black &amp; white one from 1968) on a Saturday Night on CREATURE FEATURES (San Francisco bay area TV) I was,maybe,8 years old. Maybe 9. Scared the crap out of me. In 1973-74 there really wasn't anything scarier on T.V.  I've been a zombie fan ever since. zombie-nation.net
lately i have been taking various items out to a road and throwing them out my cars window at 50mph.... usually computers.   pic of a thrown computer.. http://img41.imageshack.us/img41/2812/dsci0511.jpg http://img41.imageshack.us/img41/1967/dsci0510f.jpg  haha it actually still worked with original hard drive after being thrown out 4 times.   other times i just drive around town mindlessly burning up fuel.  i lost my girlfriend 3 weeks ago, its taking its tole on me =[ being a human sucks.
Me too. Especially when the person I'm performing the act on is doing the attacking. 
That's what she said.
You fucks need to keep the party going past midnight.
Real Player?  Egad!  Mercy!
I would like to know Jesus's birthday instead. Is it Jan. 1 or Dec. 25? I thought the calender started on Jesus's birthday.
This was (almost) exactly my senior project from 2 years ago. The difference between the two is that they provided quantitave data, I provided mechanisms.   Here's the text of mine:  http://docs.google.com/View?id=dccnfg9g_83cf5c7sgw  I won an award for my poster presentation :)  I'm no longer in the field, though.
&gt;Right, but it used to be legal to download music, too  What do you mean, it was never legal to share copyrighted music, but you don't hear people saying you shouldn't buy *any* mp3 player because *some* have DRM on them. As with most devices, you can, of course, read non-DRM files as easily and well as purchased books, like the iPod, where you can choose to pay for legal, DRM protected music(actually most music on iTunes is DRM free now) or you can download them "illegally."
I am not clear - did you commit these crimes, or were you just in the wrong place at the wrong time?  And are you constantly on the lookout now for Dog the Bounty Hunter???
where do you live now in Argentina?
The 38 minute thing has been broken when mass amounts of energy is applied, that's also in the same SG1 episode where the gate exploded(piggy backed on the x-302). As for the force shutdown, the existence of the iris on the atlantis stargate sorta proves it doesn't exist. Ports open by default, can't manually block addresses/connections, relies exclusively on a poor firewall for security.  Also you can jump wormhole from one gate to another.
I was doing this chick. It was rough and scratchy. I asked if we should use some lube to smooth things out. She gets up, goes into the bathroom, comes out, and everything is good. I ask what she did, and she said that she just picked off all of the scabs
Imho, use whichever bathroom matches your general appearance. If I ran an establishment with restrooms, I'd never, ever think of giving a transgendered individual trouble for using a bathroom he or she was most comfortable with, but unfortunately most places aren't quite that tolerant/accepting yet. 
When zombies go legume.
&gt;Though with snow it would be cooler  Nice.
YES. upvote for being mutually freaked out... i only remember the hair, peanut butter with flies (?) in it, something about paintbrushes (maybe) and bald baseball... hideous.
After watching the film for the first time I felt drained.  It's as if they filmed one of Stanley Kubrick's nightmares. It is true that it does demand too much of the viewer and I would still consider it a great film.  It treats film, as an art form, with respect and that is all too rare.
Waldorf chicken salad(chicken salad with cut up grapes,apples and walnuts) with muenster cheese and lettuce on a hard roll.
... and the plots are too linear.
[The Secret of NIMH (1982)](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Secret_of_NIMH)  Oddly enough I now have a pet rat and collect owls but they scared me stupid as a kid because of this movie.
Amarok 2 &amp; moc are currently my favorite players, but I understand the frustration. I got fed up and actually just started using the command line to do everything from ripping, tagging and transcoding. I also have some scripts that are really handy. 
I just found them by yelping the address where I am staying to see what was around.  There are only 4 reviews but all of them give it 5 stars.  I wish you Vegas people used yelp more, I'm looking for a good tailor in town.
She likes your name.
I read the article, and I have to admit that it looks like perhaps this woman was talking back.
T-Ball Stand Pitches Perfect Game at Special Olympics
Only a bus full of children? I caught an [airplane](http://www.needlenose.com/i/swopa/PlaneHudson.jpg) and they served my a 40 inch [cat fish](http://boojwah.com/wp-content/uploads/2008/10/man-eating-catfish2.bmp) for supper. Talk about a great catch.
That is a good habit to get into if you have to use out houses.  That is the most likely way to get a black widow spider bite.
Wow, fucking horrible.
Yeah, but minorities aren't funny. Just funny lookin.
Oh, man.  That's really unfortunate.  I guess, for her sake, I just hope he gets caught screwing up before she's stuck with him.  Ugh, how awful.  I wonder why he's so terrified you're going to tell her if you have no way of doing so?  Odd...
Oh, man. When the A/C dies? I covered my eyes every time.
Yeah, if you like your passwords stored in plain-text. I know IM passwords aren't all that hard to steal, but seriously? [Source](http://developer.pidgin.im/wiki/PlainTextPasswords)
what is that? 3.0?  Jesus that's messed up.
weird. upvoted !
Is it ethically responsible to be a tourist in occupied Tibet?
tinyurl? No thanks.
Your cpu is under-taxed and over-cooled. Get in on some distributed computing projects.
Hey uh, wanna go get a drink? I know of a great place for rabbits.
&gt;and there's no way in hell that ancient civilizations had any idea what plasma was.  Riiight, because those stupid people didn't even have sunlight, didn't observe stars in the sky, didn't experience gravity, didn't even have fire!   We are so modern, so beyond everything that came before us! LMAO  I can't spend any more time discussing your comment at this time, as I have to do other things,having spent too long on Reddit today already.  There certainly are examples of the 'elements' idea applied in that way...but I'm not here for you! I don't really care whether you know or not! 
I've heard a little every day is better for you.  
Don't be silly. None of those donations will go anywhere near west China.   Chances are that they are immediately pocketed by those who buy the pretty display case. Seriously, giving to any charity in China is worse than just throwing your money away. By giving money to these shysters, you are helping them carry out what is, for China, a sophisticated scam. Your change will be funding organised crime. Better off giving to DWB or any other international NGO.  Even in the world's least corrupt countries, charity fundraisers take a &gt;40% cut for raising the money. You can rest assured that in China it will be ~100%.
That was just a warning. He'd have been dead if that cat wanted him dead.
http://imgur.com/NnN3q.jpg Nice winter landscape from home! :)
I was scared shitless and left the living room. :(
It's also convoluted logic- like saying that pollution is good because it puts scientists and doctors to work.  While it is true that it is a form of sequestration, it would just be much wiser to not use so much of it.  Plastic has become synonymous with "single use", or "dollar store crap"- which is just not prudent. 
Several years ago, I was driving down a highway at about 70 mph.  It was a state road, not an Interstate.  Some people apparently decided they wanted to cross the road and didn't want to wait for cars to pass.  They were crossing to the median.  Now, I was watching them and letting off my gas, because I didn't trust them to *stop* at the median.  Most of them did except for a small child, perhaps age 5-6, who jumped out into the road right in front of me.  I swerved right, left, right; didn't hit the kid, stayed within the bounds of the lane just to my right, and ended up right back in the lane that I'd started from.  I don't consider myself to be some kind of superman.  It just takes some knowledge of how to control your car and the presence of mind to be observant of the behaviors of others around you.
Welding in general is fairly high precision work.
...well that didn't work.
it's a hat with solar panels on it so that you can charge your phone on the go.  also an oven that turns off automatically as not to burn your food when you walk away.
A lot better than my idea to turn the stray cats into Catglue
You know, science hasn't proven that wearing a frozen turkey on your head isn't healthier than not doing it.
I sorta answer that in my reply [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/Seattle/comments/aweof/i_was_a_street_kid_in_seattle_in_2000_ask_me/c0jqz9a) but to sum it up, I'd go for the places that don't get government funding. The places that do, make too many rules around it.. and are just less useful because of it.   I'd donate to PSKS, teen feed or the university youth shelter (I'm honestly not sure if the second two even do donations, they are mostly volunteer run).   I just think you would get the most bang for your buck there. Really, as far as organizations that helped me out the most.. it would definitely be Youthcare. They let me stay there for years, I didn't really move out of there until I was 21, but it was really a total of about 3 years or so.
&gt;Yeah. That's what I can't understand.   I don't understand either, to be honest. I would happily eat eggs if they came from my own pet chickens, in fact I plan on keeping some of my own when I get my own place. Keeping hens is not really viable in a college dorm, heh.  However there are multiple problems with "free range" eggs. First of all the term is very loosely regulated, so there are plenty of so-called free range farms that are not much better than battery farms (see this for example http://advocacy.britannica.com/blog/advocacy/wp-content/uploads/chickens.jpg). And of course the hens are slaughtered like any other when they are no longer productive; there's no "retirement home" for spent hens.  But the more fundamental issue is the killing of male chicks at hatcheries. Since the males don't they eggs, they are useless to the industry and literally ground up alive once their sex is determined.  Even at the largely mythical "humane" egg farm, there's no way around this problem. Even if the male chicks weren't killed, they would probably just be raised for meat; I sincerely doubt there's a demand for hundreds of millions of pet roosters.   For that reason I don't think a commercial egg farm could ever truly be both cruelty-free AND economically profitable. It would be extremely expensive to keep roosters/old hens alive when they don't produce anything in return.
Pretty sure Jacob is also a leader.  Everyone lived in my game.  I also didn't play on a high difficulty, though.  Edit:  I should say that I only used Jacob for the last of the secondary leader portions.  My first was Garrus.
